 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K
 
 ☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
 
FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2021
 
COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-27781
 
 UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
Nevada   84-1517723
(State of jurisdiction of incorporation or
organization) (I.R.S. Employee Identiﬁcation Number)
     
10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209
Henderson, NV 89052
(Address of principal executive oﬃces)  (Zip Code)
 
 Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (877) 358-3444
 
 Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (b) of the Act: None
 
 Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (g) of the Act: Common Stock, $.001 Par Value
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes
☐     No ☒
 
Check whether the Registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. ☐
  
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was
required to ﬁle such reports) and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive data ﬁle required to be
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such ﬁles). Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-accelerated ﬁler, a
smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated
ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
Large accelerated ﬁler ☐ Accelerated ﬁler ☐
Non-accelerated ﬁler ☒ Smaller reporting company ☒
    Emerging growth company ☐
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition
period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the
Exchange Act. Yes ☐     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the
eﬀectiveness of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C.
7262(b)) by the registered public accounting ﬁrm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐    
No ☒
 
As of June 30, 2021, the number of shares held by non-aﬃliates was approximately 187,735,763 shares. The approximate
market value based on the last sale (i.e. $1.01 per share as of June 30, 2021, the last business day of the second quarter)
of the Company’s Common Stock was approximately $189,613,121.
 
The number of shares issued and outstanding of the Registrant’s Common Stock, as of March 31, 2022 was 228,829,891.
 
 
 
 
Forward-looking Statements
 
Statements in this annual report on Form 10-K that are not historical facts constitute forward-looking statements which are
made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or the Exchange Act.
These statements relate to future events or our future ﬁnancial performance and involve known and unknown risks,
uncertainties and other factors that may cause our or our industry’s actual results, levels of activity, performance or
achievements to be materially diﬀerent from any future results, levels of activity, performance or achievements
expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements. Those factors include, among other things, those listed under
“Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this annual report. In some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements by
terminology such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “expects,” “plans,” “anticipates,” “believes,” “estimates,” “predicts,”
“potential” or “continue” or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These statements are only
predictions. Actual events or results may diﬀer materially. Moreover, neither we nor any other person assumes
responsibility.
 
 
2
 
 
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
 
Company Overview
 
United Health Products, Inc. (“UHP” or the “Company”) develops, manufactures, and markets a patented
hemostatic gauze for the healthcare and wound care sectors. Our gauze product, HemoStyp®, is a neutralized, oxidized,
regenerated cellulose (“NORC”) derived from cotton and designed to absorb exudate/drainage from superﬁcial wounds and
help control bleeding. We are in the process of seeking regulatory approval to sell our Hemostyp product line into the U.S.
Class III and European CE Mark surgical markets.
 
Recent Developments
 
The following developments in the Company’s business have occurred during 2021 and prior to the ﬁling of this report:
 
 •On January 21, 2021, the U.S. Patent Oﬃce provided notiﬁcation of publication of the Company’s patent application
for the method of forming and using a hemostatic hydrocolloid. This publication does not imply any assurance of
the receipt of the patent but establishes an obligation of any party that seeks to use the applicable method to pay
royalties for the right to do so. The patent application for this process remains pending as of the date of this ﬁling.
   
 •On February 11, 2021, the Company was notiﬁed that its application to establish global patent protection for the
process of creating and deploying a hydrocolloid (or gel) format of its previously patented HemoStyp technology
was accepted for publication under the procedures of the Patent Cooperation Treaty, an international patent law
treaty which provides a uniﬁed procedure for ﬁling a patent application in most foreign countries. We previously
ﬁled provisional patent applications for our HemoStyp hydrocolloid process in 2020. In January 2022 the Company
initiated steps to register its hydrocolloid patent in  the European common market and nine additional foreign
countries where we intend to commercialize any future HemoStypo gel formats. .
   
 •In May 2021 the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) provided a series of questions and comments on our
Premarket Approval (PMA) application, primarily related to the manufacturing process and standard operating
procedures. Subsequent to this communication the Company acquired and implemented industry standard good
manufacturing practice (GMP) software and submitted speciﬁc responses to the FDA in October 2021. On January
18, 2022 the FDA requested that these responses be incorporated into our full PMA application and the application
be reformatted and submitted using the FDA’s Electronic Submission Gateway (ESG).  We are working with our
regulatory consulting partner to complete the FDA’s requested actions.
 
Our HemoStyp Gauze Products
 
HemoStyp hemostatic gauze is a collagen-like natural substance created from chemically treated cellulose derived
from cotton. It is an eﬀective hemostatic agent registered with the FDA for superﬁcial use under a 510k approval obtained
in 2012 to help control bleeding from open wounds and body cavities. The HemoStyp hemostatic material contains no
chemical additives, thrombin, collagen or animal-derived products, and is hypoallergenic. When the product comes in
contact with blood it expands slightly and quickly converts to a translucent gel that subsequently breaks down into
glucose and salts. Because of its benign impact on body tissue and the fact that it degrades to non-toxic end products,
HemoStyp does not impede the healing of body tissue as do certain competing hemostatic products. Laboratory testing
has shown HemoStyp to be 100% absorbable in the human body within 24 hours, compared to days or weeks with
competing organic regenerated cellulose products. A human trial conducted in 2019 and 2020 demonstrated the
eﬀectiveness of HemoStyp in vascular, thoracic and abdominal surgical procedures.
 
HemoStyp hemostatic gauze is a ﬂexible, silk-like material that is applied by placing the gauze onto the bleeding
tissue. The supple material can be easily folded and manipulated as needed to ﬁt the size of the wound or incision. In
surface bleeding and surgical situations, the product quickly converts to a translucent gel that allows the physician or
surgeon to monitor the coagulation process. The gel maintains a neutral pH level which avoids damaging the surrounding
tissue. In superﬁcial bleeding situations, HemoStyp can be bonded to an adhesive plastic bandage or integrated into a
traditional gauze component to address a broad range of needs, including traumatic bleeding injuries and prolonged
bleeding following hemodialysis.
 
 
3
 
 
Potential Target Markets
 
Our HemoStyp material is currently cut to several sizes and conﬁguration and marketed as HemoStyp Gauze. While
we have paused our commercial activities to focus on our Class III PMA application, our potential customer base includes,
without limitation, the following:
 
  • Hospitals and Surgery Centers for all Internal Surgical usage (in the event we obtain FDA Class III approval)
  • Hospitals, Clinics and Physicians for external trauma
  • EMS, Fire Departments and other First Responders
  • Military Medical Care Providers
  • Hemodialysis centers
  • Nursing Homes and Assisted Living Facilities
  • Dental and Oral & Maxillofacial Surgery Oﬃces
  • Veterinary hospitals
 
Primary Strategy
 
Or HemoStyp technology received an FDA 510k approval in 2012 for use in external or superﬁcial bleeding
situations and we believe there is an opportunity for HemoStyp products to address unmet needs in several medical
applications that represent attractive commercial opportunities. However, the Class III surgical markets, both domestic
and international, represent the most attractive market for our products due to the smaller number of competitors oﬀering
Class III approved hemostatic agents and the resulting premium pricing for products that can meet the demanding
requirements of the human surgical environment. Our extensive laboratory testing and our completed human trial indicate
that the HemoStyp technology can successfully compete against established Class III market participants and allow us to
gain a signiﬁcant market share.
 
In 2018, we made the decision to focus our eﬀorts and resources on accessing these Class III markets to maximize
the value potential of our HemoStyp. The Class III PMA process required a substantial investment of time and resources so
we made the strategic determination to pause our sales and marketing to non-Class III markets in order to devote our full
attention to the FDA process. In the fourth quarter of 2021, with our PMA application largely complete and under review by
the FDA, we re-engaged with certain consumers and distributors of 510-k hemostatic products with the objective of
developing a revenue channel in this market going forward. Our primary market focus for this initiative includes the
hemodialysis and emergency medicine sectors.
 
In anticipation of receiving a Class III PMA, we are evaluating paths to rapidly grow our revenue and proﬁts in all
potential market segments, with the objective of maximizing shareholder value. Options under consideration include (i) a
sale or merger of the Company with an industry leader in the wound care and surgical device sectors, which may include a
pre-sale collaboration on commercialization and distribution, (ii) one or more commercial partnerships with established
market participants, without any speciﬁc, associated sale or merger transaction, and (iii) a capital raising program to
establish and grow our own marketing and distribution capabilities and drive revenue and proﬁts organically.
 
 
4
 
 
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the surgical
equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s products and business
strategy. In response to these inbound contacts, we continue to engage in discussions to evaluate the potential
commercial partnerships in anticipation of an FDA decision on our Class III PMA application. There can be no assurances
that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of these discussions. No assurances can be given that the Company will
identify any commercialization candidate(s) or complete a transaction.
 
Manufacturing and Packaging of our Products
 
The Company’s NORC products are manufactured largely in the United States to our speciﬁcations and using our
equipment through a contract manufacturing arrangement with an FDA certiﬁed contract manufacturer that maintains
stringent quality control protocols to assure the uniformity and quality of all of our gauze products. Information on our
equipment, the manufacturing process and our partner’s facility has been submitted as part of our PMA submission, which
includes the FDA inspection records of the facility. Certain of our adhesive bandage formats designed for the 510k market
are manufactured by a separate contractor based in China.
 
Patents and Trademarks
 
Our NORC technology is protected through patents ﬁled with the U.S. Patent and Trademark Oﬃce, which protection
currently runs through 2029. In 2020 and 2021, we ﬁled additional U.S. and International patents that protect the use of our
NORC technology in a gel or hydrocolloid formulation.
 
The Company has registered trademarks for the following product formats:
 
 •Boo Boo Strips
     
 •The Ultimate Bandage
     
 •Hemostrips
     
 •Nik Fix
 
Competition
 
The wound care products market in the United States is concentrated among large and established companies such
as Baxter International, Becton Dickinson & Company, Bristol-Myers Squibb Company, Johnson & Johnson and 3M
Company, each of which have greater capital and operational resources than us. Our hemostatic gauze product will
directly compete in the gauze markets served by these companies. In this market, competitive factors include product
performance, price, breadth of product oﬀerings, value-added service programs, service and delivery, credit terms, and
customer support.
  
 
5
 
 
Government Regulation
 
We are subject to oversight by various federal and state governmental entities and we are subject to, and aﬀected
by, a variety of federal and state laws, regulations and policies generally applicable to the healthcare and medical device
industries.
 
Environmental Matters
 
The Company may be subject to, or aﬀected by, environmental legislation including, among others, the Toxic
Substances Control Act, the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, Compensation and Liability Act (aka CERCLA or Superfund)
and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. There may be laws and regulations that exist or that may come to pass
that we cannot foresee that may also have an impact on the Company. Compliance with the multitude of regulations
issued by federal, state, provincial and local administrative agencies that may apply to the Company can be burdensome
and costly. To date, the Company has not been impacted by these laws and regulations.
 
Research and Development Expenditures
 
In the years ending December 31, 2021 and 2020 we incurred $237,458 and $245,218, respectively, in research and
development expenditures.
 
Personnel
 
As of March 31, 2022, we have seven full-time personnel working under consulting agreements. Additionally, we
have four Medical Advisory Board members.
 
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
 
We are engaged in the development, sale and distribution of hemostatic gauze products to stop superﬁcial bleeding. As we
develop our business, there are numerous and varied risks, known and unknown, that may prevent us from achieving our
goals. If any of these risks actually occur, our business, ﬁnancial condition or results of operation may be materially
adversely aﬀected. In such case, the trading price of our common stock could decline, and investors could lose all or part
of their investment.
 
 
6
 
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR BUSINESS
 
We have a history of operating losses and we may continue to lose money in the future
 
For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company had a net loss of $30,549,183  and $15,711,400,
respectively. We may continue to lose money in the future, and we will rely on ﬁnancing to fund our business strategy for
the foreseeable future as discussed in the Risk Factor “We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and
fund operations, which may not be available”.
 
We can provide no assurances that given that the Class III application for internal surgical procedures will
be approved by the FDA.
 
In May 2021 the FDA provided a series of questions and comments on our PMA application, primarily related to our
manufacturing process and standard operating procedures. Subsequent to this communication the Company acquired and
implemented industry standard good manufacturing practice (GMP) software and submitted speciﬁc responses to the FDA
in October 2021. On January 18, 2022 the FDA requested that these responses be incorporated into our full PMA application
and resubmitted. We are incorporating these materials into our PMA application and will to resubmit to the FDA once
completed. There can be no assurance that our application, once resubmitted, will lead to a successful FDA decision
regarding a PMA.
 
The Securities and Exchange Commission has notiﬁed us that it has made a preliminary determination to
recommend that an enforcement action be ﬁled relating to a private investigation regarding the Company,
the resolution or outcome of which cannot be predicted with any certainty
 
The Securities and Exchange Commission has been conducting a private investigation concerning the Company
since November 2018, in which the Company has been fully cooperating. The basis of the Commission’s inquiry relates to
our original accounting revenue recognition treatment of the following two events in 2017:
 
 · The ﬁrst event involved an order which the Company earmarked to ﬁll from an in-bound shipment of product
that was lost in transit. The Company recognized $130,725 in revenue from this event in the ﬁrst quarter of
2017. The lost in-bound product was never recovered and the product could not be shipped to ﬁll the order, and
the customer canceled the order in the second quarter of 2017. This event was subsequently corrected to back
out the revenue and exclude it from the audited 2017 annual ﬁnancial statements which were included in our
2017 Annual Report on Form 10-K. The Company’s prior interim period ﬁnancial statements for 2017 were not
restated to reﬂect the correction.
    
 · The second event related to a shipment of product which the Company commenced processing for a customer
without a purchase order at the end of December 2017. The product was shipped from our warehouse in
December 2017 to our third-party sterilization-contractor and ultimately shipped to the customer in January
2018 and received by the customer on February 2, 2018. The Company recognized $438,596 in revenue from this
event in its 2017 audited annual ﬁnancial statements. The Company’s customer disputed the shipment and did
not pay the Company for this product. The Company, in consultation with its then auditor, Haynie & Company,
ultimately wrote oﬀ the recorded receivable in the third and fourth quarters of 2018 as a bad debt expense.
Those write-oﬀs were reﬂected in the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September
30, 2018 and Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018. In February 2020,
we commenced a lawsuit against our customer to recover payment for the products they received and which we
allege they have marketed and sold, which is currently pending in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District
of Texas. In January 2022, the court granted our customer’s motion for summary judgment and dismissed all of
the Company’s claims. Our customer has a counterclaim against the Company seeking to be reimbursed for
legal fees and related expenses in the litigation. Due to uncertainty inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the
outcome of the counterclaim.
 
 
7
 
 
On December 17, 2019, Haynie & Company, the auditors of our 2017 and 2018 annual ﬁnancial statements, advised
us that they were resigning as our independent registered accountant, as we reported in a Current Report on Form 8-K that
we ﬁled with the Commission on December 23, 2019. As we disclosed in that Current Report, Haynie & Company orally
advised the Company that they were ceasing as the Company’s accountant because they did not want to take on the
additional work of performing the internal control audit of the Company in connection with the 2019 ﬁscal year audit that
was required due to the Company’s increased market capitalization. The Company engaged MAC Accounting Group, LLP as
its independent registered accountant on December 20, 2019, which was also disclosed in that Current Report.
 
Four months later, on March 24, 2020, Haynie & Company delivered a letter to the Company claiming: that they had
discovered inaccurate and incomplete information relating to the amount for revenue and inventory for the 2017 interim
periods; that based on investigation and new information of which they became aware, the Company’s annual ﬁnancial
statements for 2017 and 2018 and the interim periods in 2017, 2018 and 2019 were materially inaccurate, incomplete and
should be withdrawn, restated or corrected where appropriate; and that it was withdrawing its reports on the Company’s
2017 and 2018 ﬁnancial statements. The Company disclosed the foregoing in a Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled with the
Commission on March 31, 2020, as amended on Form 8-K/A ﬁled with the Commission on April 2, 2020.
 
In July 2020, in consultation with our current auditor, MAC Accounting Group, LLP, and in light of the information
available to us at that time, we determined that no revenue should have been recognized in 2017 or 2018 from the second
event described above as it did not meet all of the revenue recognition criteria under ASC 605 which was in eﬀect at the
time of the event, nor under and ASC 606, which we adopted on January 1, 2018.
 
In order to reﬂect a correction to the revenue recognition treatment from the two events, we included restatements
of our audited annual ﬁnancial statements for 2017 and 2018 and unaudited ﬁnancial statements for certain quarterly
periods during 2017, 2018 and 2019 in our 2019 Annual Report on Form 10-K which we ﬁled with the Commission on July 9,
2020.
 
In August 2020, we commenced a lawsuit against Haynie & Company which is currently pending in Utah State
Court, asserting claims related to, among other things, professional negligence – accounting malpractice, and breach of
ﬁduciary duty, in connection with the Company’s audited ﬁnancial statements for 2017 and quarterly periods during 2017.
Due to uncertainty inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of this action.
 
On September 13, 2021, the SEC Staﬀ notiﬁed us that it has made a preliminary determination in their 34-month
investigation to recommend that the Commission ﬁle an enforcement action against our Company, Douglas Beplate (our
former director, former Chairman of the Board and former CEO), and Louis Schiliro (our former director and former Chief
Operating Oﬃcer). The action would allege certain violations of the federal securities laws stemming from the original
accounting treatment of the two events mentioned above and conduct relating to that, including violations of Sections
10(b), 13(a), 13(b)(2)(A) and 13(b)(2)(B) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and Rules 10b-5, 12b-20, 13a-1, and 13a-13
thereunder, and Section 17(a) of the Securities Act of 1933. The SEC Staﬀ informed the Company and Messrs. Beplate and
Schiliro that their recommendation would involve a civil injunctive action and would seek remedies that may include
injunctions, disgorgement, pre-judgment interest and civil money penalties. Remedies may also include debarment from
serving as a director or oﬃcer of any SEC registrant and restrictions from engaging in certain activities involving “penny
stocks” as deﬁned under the Exchange Act, the latter known as the Penny Stock Bar. The SEC Staﬀ’s notice is neither a
formal charge of wrongdoing nor a ﬁnal determination that the recipient of the notice has violated any law. On October 14,
2021, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules on Informal and Other Procedures, we made a submission to the
Commission to bring facts to the Commission’s attention in connection with its consideration of this matter. We are
engaged in a dialogue with the SEC Staﬀ to work toward a resolution of this matter, however we cannot predict whether
this matter will be settled without any enforcement action being taken; or if it is not so settled, what the outcome,
remedies or the duration of the investigation or any legal proceedings or enforcement actions that may be brought will be.
 
 
8
 
 
Impacts of COVID-19 has delayed the FDA’s review and decision on our application for Class III PMA of our
HemoStyp product.
 
COVID-19 caused a diversion of resources at the FDA which has slowed the review and decision on our FDA PMA
application. During the fourth quarter of 2020 the FDA was able to re-engage with us regarding our application. However,
the FDA’s response times in 2021 continued to be longer than they customarily would be. While the FDA remains engaged
with us, the COVID-19 pandemic continues to be its priority and we cannot predict the extent to which current and future
COVID-19 related work may impact the FDA’s ability to review and arrive at a determination on our PMA application.
 
No assurances can be given that our Management plans to penetrate all market segments will be
successful.
 
We continue to believe that the Class III surgical markets, both domestic and international, represent the most
attractive market for our products due to the limited competition from other Class III approved ORC (Oxidized Regenerated
Cellulose) products and the resulting premium pricing for hemostatic agents that can meet the demanding requirements of
the human surgical environment. As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the FDA review process is ongoing and we are
preparing to submit an application for CE Mark approval in order to access the European market. In the event we receive
Class III and CE Mark approvals, the success of which cannot be assured, we are evaluating the best paths grow our
revenue and proﬁts in all potential markets, which could include one or more commercial partnerships and licensing
agreements with established market participants or an acquisition/merger agreement with any such participants, each as
an alternative to raising the necessary capital to establish and grow our own marketing and distribution capabilities via
organic growth. We will carefully evaluate the returns on investment to create shareholder value of each of these
strategies. No assurances can be given that our plans to penetrate all market segments or be acquired/merged with an
established market participant will be successful on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
We can provide no assurances that ongoing discussions with potential commercial partners and acquirers
will result in the occurrence of a speciﬁc transaction.
 
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the surgical
equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s products and business
strategy. In response to these inbound contacts, and to maximize shareholder value, the Company continues to explore a
range of strategic alternatives which include, without limitation, entering into one or more commercial and distribution
partnerships, a sale of the Company or a standalone growth plan. To assist in this review, the Company is working with a
ﬁnancial advisory ﬁrm. There can be no assurances that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of these discussions.
No assurances can be given that the Company will identify a suitable acquisition or commercialization partnership
candidate(s) or complete any transaction on terms that are in the best interests of shareholders.
 
 
9
 
 
We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and fund operations, which may not be
available.
 
We currently have a working capital deﬁcit, minimal cash and limited sales of our products. As result of the
Company’s ﬁnancial position, we may not be able to execute our current business plan and fund business operations long
enough to achieve proﬁtability. Our ultimate success will depend upon our ability to raise additional capital. There can be
no assurance that additional funds will be available when needed from any source or, if available, will be available on
terms that are acceptable to us.
 
We will pursue required additional capital through various means, including commercial collaborations and debt or
equity ﬁnancings. Future ﬁnancings through equity investments are likely to be dilutive to existing stockholders. Also, the
terms of securities we may issue in future capital transactions may be more favorable for our new investors. Newly issued
securities may include preferences, superior voting rights, the issuance of warrants or other derivative securities. The
issuances of incentive awards under existing and future employee incentive plans, may have additional dilutive eﬀects.
Further, we may incur substantial costs in pursuing future capital and/or ﬁnancing, including investment banking fees,
legal fees, accounting fees, printing and distribution expenses and other costs. We may also be required to recognize non-
cash expenses in connection with certain securities we may issue, such as convertible notes and warrants, which may
adversely impact our ﬁnancial condition.
 
Our ability to obtain needed ﬁnancing may be impaired by such factors as capital markets disruptions, both
generally and speciﬁcally relating to the healthcare industry, and events that have a negative impact on existing and
potential investors or funding sources. If the amount of capital we are able to raise from ﬁnancing activities, together with
our revenues from operations, is not suﬃcient to satisfy our capital needs we may be required to cease operations.
 
No guarantee of market acceptance.
 
Our success is dependent on market acceptance of our hemostatic gauze products. We cannot be certain that
healthcare professionals and purchasing decision makers will conclude that our products oﬀer a superior performance or
value proposition, in any or all of the target markets we have identiﬁed, or that we will attain the level of market
acceptance necessary to generate adequate revenues to cover our business costs and generate a return for investors.
 
We may be dependent upon strategic relationships to conduct our operations and implement our strategy.
 
Our strategy includes the use of distribution and commercial partnerships to market and sell our hemostatic gauze
products. We currently do not have any such strategic relationships. We may not be able to establish these strategic
relationships, or if established, we may not be able to maintain them. In addition, the dynamics of our relationships with
strategic partners may require us to incur expenses or undertake activities we would not otherwise be inclined to in order
to fulﬁll our obligations to these partners or maintain our relationships. If our strategic relationships are not established or
maintained, our business prospects may be limited, which could diminish our ability to conduct our operations. We can
provide no assurances that distribution agreements will be entered into on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, or that our
operations will be proﬁtable as a result of these distribution agreements.
 
 
10
 
 
We could experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
The majority of our NORC products are manufactured in the United States to our speciﬁcations at a single facility
under a service contract. Unforeseen events at this manufacturing location or with this manufacturer may result in a
disruption of production that could negatively impact our ability to supply our customers and generate revenues. We own
certain specialized production equipment which is installed at this manufacturing location which is not readily available
should we need to replace it. While we intend to maintain signiﬁcant supplies of ﬁnished product inventory, any prolonged
disruption this facility could have a material adverse impact on our operations and business.
 
We are currently dependent on one hemostatic gauze product to generate income in the future.
 
The Company’s hemostatic gauze products are currently our sole source of potential revenue in the future. While
we have multiple formats of this product and hope to access new markets upon receipt of a Class III PMA, we cannot
provide assurance that our product will be accepted by potential customers or that new, superior hemostatic technologies
will not be introduced that negatively impact the market perceptions of our own products. Unless we are able to develop
or acquire additional product lines, the failure to develop a commercial market for this product line will materially
adversely aﬀect our operations.
 
Our business may suﬀer if we do not attract and retain talented personnel.
 
Our success will depend in large measure on the abilities, expertise, judgment, discretion, integrity and good faith
of our management and other personnel in conducting our intended business. In addition, we depend on management and
employees to correctly interpret and respond to market data, economic and other conditions to locate and adopt
appropriate business opportunities. We presently have a small management team, which we intend to expand in
conjunction with our planned operations and growth. We intend to ensure that management and any key employees are
appropriately compensated; however, their continued service to the Company cannot be guaranteed. If we are unable to
attract and retain additional key management personnel and enter into satisfactory employment and other agreements,
our business may be adversely aﬀected.
 
We may not be able to adequately protect our technologies or intellectual property rights.
 
Our ability to achieve commercial or strategic success will depend in part on maintaining patent protection and
trade secret protection of our technologies as well as successfully defending our intellectual property against third-party
challenges. We will only be able to protect our technologies from unauthorized use by third parties to the extent that valid
and enforceable patents or trade secrets cover them. Furthermore, the degree of future protection of our proprietary rights
is uncertain because legal means aﬀord only limited protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to
gain or keep our competitive advantage. Additionally, legal enforcement of intellectual property rights is costly and we
may not have the ﬁnancial resources to take the necessary legal action to protect our rights.
 
If our intellectual property positions are challenged, invalidated, circumvented, or expire, or if we fail to prevail in
future intellectual property litigation, our business could be adversely aﬀected. We have created multiple variations of our
gauze product and will protect each of these new generation platforms and product with additional intellectual property.
Our success depends in part on our ability to defend our intellectual property rights. The patent positions of
pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies can be highly uncertain and often involve complex legal, scientiﬁc, and
factual questions. Third parties may seek to challenge, invalidate, or circumvent our intellectual property rights. In
addition, our patent positions might not protect us against competitors with similar products or technologies because
competing products or technologies may not infringe our patents. Also, there are third parties who have patents or pending
patent applications that they may claim necessitate payment of a royalty or prevent us from commercializing our patent
in certain territories. Patent disputes are frequent, costly and can preclude, delay, or increase the cost of
commercialization of products.
 
 
11
 
 
We have identiﬁed various material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting which could
aﬀect our ability to timely and accurately report our results of operations and ﬁnancial condition. These
material weaknesses may not have been fully remediated as of the ﬁling date of this report and we cannot
assure you that other material weaknesses will not be identiﬁed in the future.
 
Our Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Principal Financial Oﬃcer have concluded that, as of December 31, 2021, we had
material weaknesses in our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting and that, as a result, our disclosure controls and
procedures and our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting were not eﬀective at such date. A material weakness is a
deﬁciency, or combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting that creates a reasonable possibility
that a material misstatement of our annual or interim ﬁnancial statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely
basis.
 
In addition, we believe that we continued to have material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting subsequent to December 31, 2021. See “Controls and Procedures” under Item 9A for a detailed discussion of the
material weaknesses identiﬁed as of December 31, 2021 and possible material weaknesses as of subsequent periods.
Although we are in the process of implementing remedial measures to address all of the identiﬁed material weaknesses,
our assessment of the impact of these measures has not been completed as of the ﬁling date of this report, and we cannot
assure you that these measures will be adequate. Moreover, we cannot assure you that additional material weaknesses in
our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting will not arise or be identiﬁed in the future.
 
As a result, we must continue to improve our operational, information technology, and ﬁnancial systems,
infrastructure, procedures, and controls, as well as continue to expand, train, retain, and manage our employee base. Any
failure to do so, or any diﬃculties we encounter during implementation, could result in additional material weaknesses or
in material misstatements in our ﬁnancial statements. These misstatements could result in a future restatement of our
ﬁnancial statements, could cause us to fail to meet our reporting obligations, or could cause investors to lose conﬁdence in
our reported ﬁnancial information, leading to a decline in our stock price.
 
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed substantial doubt about our ability to
continue as a going concern. This could make it more diﬃcult for us to raise funds and adversely aﬀect our
relationships with creditors, investors and suppliers.
 
Our auditors believe that substantial doubt exists regarding our ability to remain in business. We cannot provide
any assurance that we will in fact operate our business proﬁtably or obtain suﬃcient ﬁnancing to sustain our business in
the event we are not successful in our eﬀorts to generate suﬃcient revenue and operating cash ﬂow. The expression of
such doubt by our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm or our inability to overcome the factors leading to such
doubt could have a material adverse eﬀect on our relationships with prospective customers, creditors, investors and
suppliers, and therefore could have a material adverse eﬀect on our business.
 
 
12
 
 
The healthcare industry is subject to extensive government regulation, which can result in increased costs,
delays, limits on its operating ﬂexibility and competitive disadvantages.
 
The healthcare industry is generally subject to extensive regulatory requirements. Adhering to these requirements
generally carries signiﬁcant costs to industry participants, including our Company. Given our limited ﬁnancial resources
these signiﬁcant costs may adversely aﬀect our business and ﬁnancial results. If we are unable to pass on these costs
through our product pricing they would negatively impact our proﬁt margin.
 
Healthcare insurance legislation may lead to unintended adverse eﬀects for businesses involved in our industry.
New legislation that gives the Federal government greater regulatory powers may lead to negative consequences for
certain aspects of our business. The full scope of the ongoing uncertainty in healthcare related legislation may not be
known for several years, making it diﬃcult to predict the future consequences that would create challenges to our
Company, or if we can overcome them.
 
Failure to comply with laws or government regulations could result in penalties.
 
Certain government requirements for technologies in the healthcare market may require licensure or mandatory
minimum standards relating to the provision of products and services. Failure to comply with these requirements could
materially aﬀect our ability to expand into new or existing markets. Future regulatory developments may also cause
disruptions to our operations.
 
GENERAL RISK FACTORS
 
We are subject to the reporting requirements of the federal securities laws, which can be expensive.
 
We are a public reporting company and, accordingly, subject to the information and reporting requirements of the
Exchange Act and other federal and state securities laws, including compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. The
costs of preparing and ﬁling annual and quarterly reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC and
furnishing audited reports to stockholders increase our operating costs.
 
It is time consuming, diﬃcult and costly for us to develop and implement the internal controls and reporting
procedures required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. We may need to hire additional ﬁnancial reporting, internal controls and
other ﬁnance personnel in order to develop and implement appropriate internal controls and reporting procedures. If we
are unable to comply with the internal control’s requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, we may not be able to obtain the
independent accountant certiﬁcations required by that Act.
 
 
13
 
 
Public company compliance requirements may make it more diﬃcult to attract and retain oﬃcers and
directors.
 
The Sarbanes-Oxley Act and rules subsequently implemented by the SEC have required changes in corporate
governance practices of public companies. Compliance with the new rules and regulations increases our operating costs
and makes certain activities more time consuming and costly than if we were not a public company. As a public company,
these new rules and regulations make it more diﬃcult and expensive for us to obtain director and oﬃcer liability
insurance. As a result, it may be more diﬃcult for us to attract and retain qualiﬁed persons to serve on our Board of
Directors or as executive oﬃcers.
 
There exist risks to stockholders relating to dilution: authorization of additional securities and reduction of
percentage share ownership following investment.
 
To the extent that additional shares of common stock are issued, our existing stockholders would experience
dilution of their respective ownership interests in the Company. Additionally, if the Company issues a substantial number
of shares of common stock in connection with or following an investment, a change in control of the Company may occur
which may aﬀect, among other things, the Company’s ability to utilize net operating loss carry forwards, if any.
Furthermore, the issuance of a substantial number of shares of common stock may adversely aﬀect prevailing market
prices for our common stock and could impair the Company’s ability to raise additional capital through the sale of its
equity securities. The Company has in the past and may in the future compensate certain consultants and other service
providers using our shares of common stock, which would result in further dilution for our existing stockholders.
 
Our stock price may be volatile.
 
The market price of our common stock is likely to be highly volatile and could ﬂuctuate widely in response to
various factors, many of which are beyond our control, including the following:
 
  • changes in the healthcare industry;
  • competitive pricing pressures;
  • our ability to obtain working capital ﬁnancing;
  • additions or departures of key personnel;
  • our ability to execute our business plan;
  • operating results that fall short of expectations;
  • loss of certain material strategic relationships;
  • regulatory developments;
 • economic and other external factors, including among others, eﬀects on the markets stemming from the COVID-
19 pandemic; and
  • period-to-period ﬂuctuations in our ﬁnancial results.
 
In addition, the securities markets have from time-to-time experienced signiﬁcant price and volume ﬂuctuations
that are unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These market ﬂuctuations may also materially
and adversely aﬀect the market price of our common stock.
 
We have not paid dividends in the past and do not expect to pay dividends in the future. Any return on
investment may be limited to changes in the value of our common stock.
 
We have never paid cash dividends on our common stock and do not anticipate doing so in the foreseeable future.
The payment of cash dividends on our common stock will depend on earnings, ﬁnancial condition and other business and
economic factors aﬀecting us at such time as our board of directors may consider relevant. If we do not pay dividends,
return on investment will only occur if our stock price appreciates.
 
 
14
 
 
There is currently no established market for our common stock, and we cannot ensure that one will ever
develop or be sustained.
 
The Company’s common stock is available for trading on the OTC Pink. Management considers the market for our
common stock to be limited. We can provide no assurances that an established trading market for our common stock will
exist in the future.
 
Our common stock is deemed a “penny stock”, which may make it more diﬃcult for our investors to sell
their shares.
 
Our common stock is subject to the “penny stock” rules adopted under Section 15(g) of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934. The penny stock rules apply to companies whose common stock is not listed on a national securities exchange
and trades at less than $5.00 per share or that have tangible net worth of less than $5,000,000 ($2,000,000 if the company
has been operating for three or more years). These rules require, among other things, that brokers who trade penny stock
to persons other than “established customers” complete certain documentation, make suitability inquiries of investors
and provide investors with certain information concerning trading in the security, including a risk disclosure document and
quote information under certain circumstances. Many brokers have decided not to trade penny stocks because of the
requirements of the penny stock rules and, as a result, the number of broker-dealers willing to act as market makers in
such securities is limited. If we remain subject to the penny stock rules for any signiﬁcant period, it could have an adverse
eﬀect on the market, if any, for our securities. In as much as our securities are subject to the penny stock rules, investors
may ﬁnd it more diﬃcult to dispose of our securities.
 
Oﬀers or availability for sale of a substantial number of shares of our common stock may cause the price of
our common stock to decline.
 
If certain of our stockholders seek to sell substantial amounts of our common stock in the public market upon the
expiration of any holding period under Rule 144, or expiration of lock-up periods applicable to outstanding shares, or
issued upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants, it could create a circumstance commonly referred to as an
“overhang” and in anticipation of which the market price of our common stock could fall. The existence of an overhang,
whether or not sales have occurred or are occurring, also could make more diﬃcult our ability to raise additional ﬁnancing
through the sale of equity or equity-related securities in the future at a time and price that we deem reasonable or
appropriate.
 
Impacts of COVID-19 to Business and the General Economy
 
COVID-19 has caused a material and substantial adverse impact on the general economy, the impacts of which are
currently not fully known. We are conducting business as usual with some modiﬁcations and have observed other
companies taking precautionary and preemptive actions to address COVID-19. We will continue to actively monitor the
situation and may take further actions that alter our business operations as may be required by federal, state or local
authorities or that we determine are in the best interests of our employees, potential partners, suppliers and stockholders.
 
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
 
None
 
 
15
 
 
ITEM 2. DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY
 
The Company is utilizing on a temporary basis, rent free, a central mailing address as its principal executive oﬃce,
located at 10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052. The Company is a virtual company with personnel in
Nevada and ﬁve other states working remotely.
 
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
 
The following material legal proceedings are pending against us:
  
Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director and Chief Medical Oﬃcer at various time between
2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our former Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in
the United States District Court of the District of Nevada. The claimant has claimed, among other things, that: the June 25,
2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment Agreement with the Company, which amended the Employment
Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not enforceable due to lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase
Agreement pursuant to which the claimant sold Company shares issued to him under the Amendment to a third party is
unenforceable (despite the fact that payment for the shares under the Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the
term of the plaintiﬀ’s 2014 Employment Agreement remain in eﬀect and that he is entitled to cash and stock
compensation under that Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is
enforceable, he is entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were issued to
him and sold to a third party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr.
Beplate defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the
parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase Agreement; money
damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company believes that it has meritorious
defenses to the matters claimed. The Company ﬁled a motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀ’s claims which was denied on March
19, 2020. On May 5, 2021 the plaintiﬀ provided a deposition as instructed by the Court, subsequent to which the Company
ﬁled a motion for dismissal of this proceeding. On February 14, 2022, the Court issued an Order which declared the
Amendment to be unenforceable and thus the terms of the original Employment Agreement to remain in eﬀect. The Order
also noted that the Company is not a party to the Stock Purchase Agreement, and the Employment Agreement does not
constitute a prior agreement that could have been superseded by the Stock Purchase Agreement. The parties are currently
engaged in settlement discussions.
 
In 2018 an action was commenced in the United States District Court Southern District of New York entitled JEC
Consulting Associates, LLC. Liquidator of Lead Dog Capital LP against United Health Products t/k/a United EcoEnergy Corp
and Douglas K. Beplate under Docket Number 18-cv-1139 (ER). The third party action sought to remove a restrictive
legend from a particular stock certiﬁcate for Three Million Fifty Thousand (3,050,000) shares and declare the shares to be
free trading. The third party plaintiﬀ alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate refused to have the restrictive legend on
the stock certiﬁcate removed under Rule 144 and sought compensatory and punitive damages. The Federal court issued an
order that the Securities Exchange Commission should review the claim before the District Court renders a ﬁnal ruling.
Discovery appears to be substantially complete and settlement discussions between the third party plaintiﬀ and the
Company have been initiated.
 
 
16
 
 
Litigation commenced by the Company:
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the Texas District
Court for the 215th Judicial District of Harris County against defendants Patterson Companies Inc., Patterson Management,
L.P., Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc., and Animal Health International, Inc. On March 5,
2020, the defendants removed the case to U.S. District Court for Southern District of Texas. The defendants ﬁled a Motion
for Summary Judgment which was granted by the court on January 19, 2022 dismissing the Company’s claims. The
defendants ﬁled a counterclaim against the Company seeking to be reimbursed for legal fees and related expenses in the
litigation. On February 11, 2022, the parties entered into a ﬁnal Settlement Agreement and Mutual Release wherein the
Company paid $120,000 to the defendant.
  
In August 2020, United Health Products ﬁled suit against its former auditors, Haynie & Company, in Utah State
Court, asserting claims related to professional negligence and breach of ﬁduciary duty. Haynie & Company has denied the
allegations. Discovery is largely complete and the parties have each submitted a report by their respective expert witness
to the Court.
 
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of the legal proceedings described herein.
 
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
 
None.
 
 
17
 
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF
EQUITY SECURITIES.
 
(a) Market information
 
The common shares of the Company trade on the OTC Pink under the symbol UEEC. There has been only limited
trading activity to date. The following table sets forth the high and low sales price of the common stock on a quarterly
basis for the periods presented, rounded to the nearest penny.
 
   High   Low  
For Year Ended 2021         
First Quarter  $ 1.18  $ 1.00 
Second Quarter  $ 1.19  $ 0.83 
Third Quarter  $ 1.08  $ 0.94 
Fourth Quarter  $ 0.99  $ 0.53 
            
For Year Ended 2020           
First Quarter  $ 1.30  $ 0.60 
Second Quarter  $ 0.86  $ 0.71 
Third Quarter  $ 1.89  $ 0.55 
Fourth Quarter  $ 1.49  $ 1.28 
 
(b) Holders
 
As of March 31, 2022, there were approximately 413 holders of record of the Company’s issued and outstanding
shares of common stock.
 
(c) Dividends
 
The Company has not paid any dividends to date, has not yet generated earnings suﬃcient to pay dividends, and
currently does not intend to pay dividends in the foreseeable future.
 
 
18
 
 
(d) Stock Issuances and Repurchases
 
The following table summarizes all sales and issuances by the Company of unregistered securities during the year
ended December 31, 2021. The securities in the below-referenced transactions were (i) issued without registration and (ii)
were subject to restrictions under the Securities Act and the securities laws of certain states, in reliance on the private
oﬀering exemptions contained in Sections 4(a)(2), 4(a)(6) and/or 3(b) of the Securities Act and on Regulation D
promulgated under the Securities Act, and in reliance on similar exemptions under applicable state laws as transactions
not involving a public oﬀering. No placement or underwriting fees were paid in connection with these transactions. All cash
proceeds from the sale of securities were used for working capital and general corporate purposes.
 
Date of Sale  Title of Security Number
Sold  Consideration Received
January 2021 Common Stock 31,930,000 N/A. Issued upon vesting and settlement of Restricted Stock
Unit awards(1)
January 2021  Common Stock  2,000,000 $2,180,000 of services rendered at $1.09 per share
February 5, 2021  Common Stock  100,000 $111,000 of services rendered at $1.11 per share
February 16, 2021  Common Stock  100,000 $85,000 conversion of debt at $0.85 per share
March 30, 2021  Common Stock  125,000 $100,000 in cash at $0.80 per share;
January – March 31,
2021 Common Stock  2,300,250 $1,151,626 conversion of notes at $0.50 per share
January – March 31,
2021 Common Stock  177,835 In satisfaction of debt and accrued liabilities of $153,523
valued at $188,713
April 2021  Common Stock  325,000 N/A. Issued upon vesting and settlement of Restricted Stock
Unit awards(1)
June 30, 2021  Common Stock  37,996 $30,396 conversion of notes and accrued interest thereon at
$0.80 per share
July 21, 2021  Common Stock  300,000 $312,000 settlement of litigation at $1.04 per share
August – September
2021 Common Stock  370,455 $326,000 in cash at $0.88 per share
September 2021   Common Stock  200,000   N/A. Issued upon vesting and settlement of Restricted
Stock Unit awards(1)
October 15, 2021  Common Stock  61,000 $53,802 in cash at $0.88 per share
November 2021  Common Stock  1,240,250 In satisfaction of accrued liabilities of $617,625 valued at
$1,017,005
November 2021  Common Stock  35,000 N/A. Issued upon vesting and settlement of Restricted Stock
Unit awards
November 2021  Common Stock  125,000 $102,500 of services rendered at $0.82 per share
 
(1)See Item 11 Executive Compensation under the heading Stock Awards – Restricted Stock Units in Company’s Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, ﬁled March 30, 2021 for a discussion about the Restricted Stock Unit
Agreements under which these shares were issued.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, there were no repurchases of the Company’s unregistered securities.
 
(e) Description of Our Capital Stock
 
The following description of our capital stock is a summary only and is qualiﬁed by reference to our Certiﬁcate of
Incorporation and Bylaws, which are included as Exhibits 3.1, 3.2, 3.3 and 3.4 to this report.
 
General
 
Our authorized capital stock consists of 300,000,000 shares of common stock, with a par value of $0.001 per share.
As of March 31, 2022, there were 228,829,891 shares of common stock issued and outstanding.
  
Common Stock
 
Each holder of Common Stock will be entitled to one vote for each share of Common Stock held of record by such
holder with respect to all matters to be voted on or consented to by our stockholders, except as may otherwise be required
by applicable Nevada law. The stockholders will not have pre-emptive rights under our Certiﬁcate of Incorporation to
acquire additional shares of Common Stock or other securities. The Common Stock will not be subject to redemption rights
and will carry no subscription or conversion rights. In the event of liquidation of the Company, the stockholders will be
entitled to share in corporate assets on a pro rata basis after the Company satisﬁes all liabilities and after provision is
made for each class of capital stock having preference over the Common Stock (if any). Subject to the laws of the State of
Nevada, and the rights of the holders of any outstanding series of preferred stock (if any), the Board of Directors will
determine, in their discretion, to declare dividends advisable and payable to the holders of outstanding shares of Common
Stock.
 
 
19
 
 
Transfer Agent and Registrar
 
Paciﬁc Stock Transfer Company is the registrar and transfer agent for our shares of common stock. Its address is
6725 Via Austi Pkwy, Suite 300, Las Vegas, NV 89119, United States; Telephone: (800) 785-7782.
 
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 
Not applicable.
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATION
 
You should read the following discussion and analysis of our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations together with our
ﬁnancial statements and related notes appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K. This discussion and
analysis contain forward-looking statements that involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. The actual results may
diﬀer materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking statements as a result of certain factors, including, but
not limited to, those set forth under ‘Risk Factors’ and elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K.
 
Results of Operations years ending December 31, 2021 and 2020
 
The following table sets forth a summary of certain key ﬁnancial information for the years ended December 31, 2021 and
2020:
 
   2021   2020  
          
Revenue  $ 59  $ 643 
            
Gross proﬁt  $ 34  $ 448 
            
Operating (expenses)  $(29,800,669) $(14,849,099)
            
Operating (loss)  $(29,800,635) $(14,848,651)
            
Other income (expense)  $(748,548) $(862,749)
            
Net (loss)  $(30,549,183) $(15,711,400)
            
Basic and diluted  $ (0.14) $ (0.09)
 
 
20
 
 
Year ended December 31, 2021 versus year ended December 31, 2020
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company had $59 and $643 of revenues, respectively. The
minimal revenues are due to the continued focus of the Company’s capital and resources towards obtaining a Class III
PMA.
 
Total operating expenses for the year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 were $29,800,669 and $14,849,099,
respectively. The increase in operating expenses is due primarily to a $14,138,292 increase in stock-based compensation
expense, $69,649 write-oﬀ of inventory, $101,350 write-oﬀ of property and equipment and $682,000 of litigation
settlement expense during 2021 (see Note 7 to the ﬁnancial statements) which the Company did not have in 2020.
  
The increase in stock-based compensation is primarily related to vesting and amortization of RSUs. During the year
ended December 31, 2021, the Company amended the RSU agreement with its former Chief Executive Oﬃcer and
Chairman. The amendment resulted in the vesting of 21,970,000 RSUs along with the issuance of an additional 2,000,000
shares of restricted stock as a bonus. The change in vesting and issuance of the bonus shares of common stock resulted in
the immediate recognition of $26,127,300 in stock-based compensation expense. The Company also recognized $43,121
of stock-based compensation due to the amortization of the RSUs that vested on January 1, 2021, issued 100,000 shares of
common stock for settlement of a consulting agreement valued at $111,000, issued 125,000 shares of common stock for
services valued at $102,500 and issued 560,000 shares of common stock valued at $477,175 due to vesting of RSUs.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company recorded $12,420,930 of stock-based compensation
related to an amendment to the restricted stock award agreement made during the year. The amendment resulted in the
vesting of 7,595,000 of restricted stock unit (“RSU”) awards and the immediate recognition of $5,392,450 of expenses and
also $7,028,480 of stock-based compensation due to the amortization of the RSUs that vested on January 1, 2021. The
Company also issued 425,000 shares of common stock for services with a value of $301,875.
 
Other income (expense) for the year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was $(748,548) and $(862,749),
respectively. The increase in other expense was due to total interest expense of $618,251 and loss on debt settlement of
$434,570 oﬀset by other income of $304,273. The increase in interest expense is primarily due to the amortization of
beneﬁcial conversion features on convertible notes payable and convertible notes payable – related party during the year
ended December 31, 2021 totaling $608,710 compared to $535,766 in the year ended December 31, 2020. The loss on
debt settlement is due to the Company issuing shares of common stock with a fair value of $1,205,718 for the settlement
of $771,148 of various debts and accrued liabilities – related party. Other income is due to the Company receiving
$304,273 as full and ﬁnal payment for settlement of its December 2019 arbitration with Maxim.
 
Our net loss for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $30,549,183 as compared to a net loss of $15,711,400 for
the prior year. The increase in the net loss is due to an increase in stock-based stock compensation of $14,138,292,
$69,649 write-oﬀ of inventory, $101,350 write-oﬀ of property and equipment and an increase in litigation settlement
expenses of $682,000 compared to the prior year for the reasons described above.
  
 
21
 
 
Financial Condition, Liquidity and Capital Resources
 
As of December 31, 2021, the Company had a negative working capital of $1,141,894. The Company has not yet
attained a level of operations, and for the foreseeable future will not be pursuing commercial operations, which will allow
it to meet its current overhead expense obligations. The report of our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm on our
2021 and 2020 ﬁnancial statements includes an explanatory paragraph expressing substantial doubt about our ability to
continue as a going concern. While the Company has funded its initial operations with private placements, and unsecured
loans from related parties, there can be no assurance that adequate ﬁnancing will continue to be available to the Company
and, if available, on terms that are favorable to the Company. Our ability to continue as a going concern is also dependent
on many events outside of our direct control, including, among other things, our ability to achieve our business goals and
objectives, as well as improvement in the economic climate.
 
Cash Flows
 
The Company’s cash on hand as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 was $21,799 and $46,076, respectively.
 
The following table summarizes selected items from our statements of cash ﬂows for the years ended December
31, 2021 and 2020:
 
   2021  2020 
Net cash used in operating activities  $(828,079) $(1,325,862)
Net cash used in investing activities    -   (101,350)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities   803,802   1,456,664 
            
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents  $(24,277) $29,452 
 
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Operating Activities
 
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $828,079. The Company had net
loss of $30,549,183 oﬀset by non-cash stock-based compensation of $26,861,097, amortization of debt discount of
$608,710, stock issued for litigation settlement of $312,000, write-oﬀ of inventory of $69,649, write-oﬀ of property and
equipment of $101,350 and a loss on settlement of debt of $434,570. The Company also had a decrease in inventory of
$26, change in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $693,692, a change in accounts payable and accrued expenses
related party of $525,011 and a change in accrued litigation settlement of $120,000. The Company also had an increase in
prepaid and other current assets of $5,000.
  
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $1,325,862. The Company had net
loss of $15,711,400 oﬀset by stock-based compensation of $12,722,805, amortization of debt discount of $535,766, write-
oﬀ of inventory of $6,979, loss on debt settlement of $316,521, a decrease in inventory of $195, an increase in accounts
payable and accrued expenses of $360,465 and an increase in accrued liabilities - related party of $442,807.
 
Net Cash Used by Investing Activities
 
The Company did not have any investing activities during the year ended December 31, 2021.
 
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $101,350, used to purchase
manufacturing equipment during the year.
 
 
22
 
 
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Financing Activities
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $803,802 consisting of
$245,500 in proceeds from related party loans, $479,802 in proceeds from the sale of stock and $115,000 in proceeds from
the issuance of convertible notes oﬀset by $36,500 of repayments to related parties.
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $1,456,664, comprised of
$1,130,696 in proceeds from the sale of stock and receipt of $831,730 from related parties oﬀset by repayment of
$505,762 in related party loans.
 
Oﬀ-Balance Sheet Arrangements
 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had no oﬀ-balance sheet arrangements.
 
Related Parties
 
Information concerning related party transactions is included in the ﬁnancial statements and related notes,
appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K.
 
Critical Accounting Policies
 
Revenue Recognition
 
The Company recognizes revenue in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers. Under ASC
606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the following steps: (1) identify
the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price;
(4) allocate the transaction price to each performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each
performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are recognized
based on the agreed upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised goods are transferred
to the customer. The transfer of goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s performance obligation will
occur either at the time when products are shipped or when the products arrive and are received by the customer. No
discounts were oﬀered by the Company. The Company does not provide an estimate for returns as there is no anticipation
for any returns in the normal course of business.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-Stock
Compensation. Under the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is measured at the fair
value of the consideration received, or the fair value of the equity instruments issued, or liabilities incurred, whichever is
more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all stock-based awards to employees and directors is recognized
as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally the vesting period.
 
The Company accounts for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with Accounting
Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to Nonemployee Share-
Based Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at the value on the grant date.
 
 
23
 
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
 
The ﬁnancial statements required by Item 8 can be found beginning on Page F-2 of this report.
 
 
F-1
 
 
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
 
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders
United Health Products, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets of United Health Products, Inc. as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and
the related statement of operations, stockholders’ deﬁciency, and cash ﬂows for each of the two years in the period ended
December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the “ﬁnancial statements”). In our opinion, the
ﬁnancial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of United Health Products, Inc. as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the two years in the period
ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the entity will continue as a going concern. As
discussed in Note 2 to the ﬁnancial statements, the entity has suﬀered recurring losses from operations, has negative
working capital and operations have not provided cash ﬂows to cover operating expenses or meet current obligations. 
This raises substantial doubt about its ability to continue as a going concern. Management's plans in regard to these
matters are also described in Note 2. The ﬁnancial statements do not include any adjustments that might result from the
outcome of this uncertainty.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the entity’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion
on these ﬁnancial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) ("PCAOB") and are required to be independent with respect to United Health
Products, Inc. in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. United Health Products, Inc. is not required to have, nor were we engaged to
perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits we are required to obtain an
understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the
eﬀectiveness of the entity's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining,
on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the
overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matters
 
Critical audit matters are matters arising from the current period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that
are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. We
determined that there are no critical audit matters.
 
/s/ Mac Accounting Group, LLP
 
We have served as United Health Products, Inc.’s auditor since 2019.
 
Midvale, Utah
 
April 1, 2022
PCAOB ID 6258
 
 
F-2
 
 
    UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
Balance Sheets
 
   December
31,  December
31, 
   2021   2020  
          
ASSETS  
Current Assets         
Cash and Cash Equivalents  $ 21,799  $ 46,076 
Inventory    -    69,674 
Prepaid and other current assets    5,000    - 
Total current assets    26,799    115,750 
            
Property and equipment    -    101,350 
            
TOTAL ASSETS  $ 26,799  $ 217,100 
            
Current Liabilities           
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 826,486  $ 416,759 
Accrued liabilities - related parties    3,207    193,651 
Accrued litigation settlement    120,000    - 
Loans payable – related parties    219,000    - 
Convertible notes payable, net of debt discount    -    103,920 
Convertible notes payable – related party, net of debt discount    -    456,032 
Total current liabilities   1,168,693   1,170,362 
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES   1,168,693   1,170,362 
            
Commitments and Contingencies    -    - 
            
Stockholders' Deﬁcit           
Series A Convertible Preferred Stock - $0.001 par value, 1,000,000 shares Authorized and
0 shares issued and outstanding  -   - 
Common Stock - $0.001 par value, 300,000,000 shares Authorized, 228,667,229 and
189,357,090 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31,
2020  
228,667   
189,357 
Additional Paid-In Capital   71,017,881   40,696,640 
Accumulated Deﬁcit   (72,388,442)  (41,839,259)
Total Stockholders' Deﬁcit   (1,141,894)  (953,262)
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT  $ 26,799  $ 217,100 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-3
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Operations
 
   2021   2020  
          
Revenues  $ 59  $ 643 
Cost of sales    25    195 
Gross proﬁt    34    448 
            
Operating Costs and Expenses           
Selling, general and administrative expenses   29,563,211   14,603,881 
Research and development expenses    237,458    245,218 
Total Operating Expenses   29,800,669   14,849,099 
            
Loss from Operations   (29,800,635)  (14,848,651)
            
Other income (expenses)           
Interest expense   (226,139)  (210,025)
Interest expense – related party   (392,112)  (336,203)
Loss on settlement of debt   (434,570)  (316,521)
Other income    304,273    - 
Total other income (expense)   (748,548)  (862,749)
            
Income tax expense    -    - 
            
Net Loss  $(30,549,183) $(15,711,400)
            
Net Loss per common share:           
Basic and diluted  $ (0.14) $ (0.09)
            
Weighted average number of shares outstanding   225,741,684   183,756,271 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-4
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statement of Stockholders’ Deﬁciency
For the Years Ended December 31, 2021 and 2020
 
           Additional         
    Common Stock   Paid-in  Accumulated     
   Shares  Amount  Capital  Deﬁcit  Total 
                      
Balance at December 31, 2019   178,300,337  $178,300  $25,045,754  $(26,127,859) $(903,805)
                           
Beneﬁcial conversion feature    -    -   909,565    -    909,565 
                           
Issuance of common stock for services    425,000    425   301,450    -    301,875 
                           
Stock-based compensation on vesting of
restricted stock units  7,595,000   7,595   12,413,335   -   12,420,930 
                           
Issuance of common stock for debt   1,058,634    1,059   865,423    -    866,482 
                           
Sale of common stock   2,000,500    2,000   1,128,696    -   1,130,696 
                           
Cancelled shares    (22,381)   (22)   22    -    - 
                           
Forgiveness of related party debt    -    -    32,395    -    32,395 
                           
Net Loss    -    -        (15,711,400)  (15,711,400)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2020   189,357,090   189,357  40,696,640  (41,839,259)  (953,262)
                           
Beneﬁcial conversion feature    -    -   234,912    -    234,912 
                           
Issuance of common stock for services and
compensation  34,715,000   34,715   26,826,382   -   26,861,097 
                           
Sale of common stock    556,455    557   479,245    -    479,802 
                           
Cancelled shares   (117,647)   (118)   118    -    - 
                           
Common stock issued for litigation
settlement  300,000   300   311,700   -   312,000 
                           
Common stock issued to settle accrued
liabilities – related party  1,013,085   1,013   866,355   -   867,368 
                           
Common stock issued to settle related party
advances  25,000   25   26,725   -   26,750 
                           
Common stock issued to settle accrued
liabilities  380,000   380   311,220   -   311,600 
                           
Common stock issued for conversion of
convertible notes payable and accrued
interest  
1,085,135   
1,085   
589,382   
-   
590,467 
                           
Common stock issued for conversion of
convertible notes payable and accrued
interest – related party  
1,353,111   
1,353   
675,202   
-   
676,555 
                           
Net Loss    -    -        (30,549,183)  (30,549,183)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2021   228,667,229  $228,667  $71,017,881  $(72,388,442) $(1,141,894)
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-5
 
 
  UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Cash Flows
 
   2021   2020  
          
Cash Flows from Operating Activities:         
Net Loss  $(30,549,183) $(15,711,400)
Adjustments to Reconcile Net Loss to Net Cash Used in Operating Activities:           
Stock for services and compensation   26,861,097   12,722,805 
Loss on settlement of debt    434,570    316,521 
Write-oﬀ of inventory    69,649    6,979 
Write-oﬀ of property and equipment    101,350    - 
Stock issued for litigation settlement    312,000    - 
Amortization of debt discount    608,710    535,766 
            
Changes in assets and liabilities:           
Inventory    25    195 
Prepaid and other current assets    (5,000)   - 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses    693,692    360,465 
Accrued litigation settlement    120,000    - 
Accrued liabilities – related party    525,011    442,807 
Net Cash Used In Operating Activities   (828,079)  (1,325,862)
            
Cash Flows from Investing Activities:           
Purchase of property and equipment    -   (101,350)
Net Cash Used In Investing Activities    -   (101,350)
            
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:           
Repayment to related parties    (36,500)  (505,762)
Proceeds from related parties    245,500    251,730 
Proceeds from convertible notes payable – related party    -    580,000 
Proceeds from convertible notes payable    115,000    - 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock    479,802   1,130,696 
Net Cash Provided By Financing Activities    803,802   1,456,664 
            
Increase (decrease) in Cash and Cash Equivalents    (24,277)   29,452 
Cash and Cash Equivalents - Beginning of period    46,076    16,624 
            
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS - END OF PERIOD  $ 21,799  $ 46,076 
            
Supplemental cash ﬂow information:           
Cash paid for interest  $ -  $ - 
Cash paid for income taxes  $ -  $ - 
            
Schedule of Non-Cash Financing Activities:           
Cancellation of common stock  $ 117  $ 22 
Forgiveness of related party debt  $ -  $ 32,395 
Common stock issued to settle accrued liabilities – related party  $ 561,148  $ - 
Common stock issued to settle accounts payable and accrued liabilities  $ 190,000  $ - 
Common stock issued for debt  $ -  $ 549,567 
Debt discount related to beneﬁcial conversion feature  $ 234,912  $ 909,565 
Conversion of accounts payable and accrued liabilities to convertible notes payable  $ 90,000  $ 250,000 
Accrued liabilities – related party converted to
convertible notes payable – related party $ 112,500  $ 258,750 
Accrued liabilities – related party converted to
convertible notes payable $ -  $ 100,000 
Conversion of accrued liabilities – related party to loans payable – related parties  $ 30,000  $ - 
Common stock issued to settle related party advances  $ 20,000  $ - 
Common stock issued for conversion of convertible notes payable and accrued interest $ 590,467  $ - 
Common stock issued for conversion of convertible notes payable and accrued interest –
related party $ 676,555  $ - 
Convertible notes payable and accrued interest– related party converted to convertible
notes payable and accrued interest $ 176,502  $ 198,778 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-6
 
  
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2021 AND 2020
 
Note 1. Description of the Business
 
United Health Products, Inc. (the “Company”) develops, manufactures, and markets a patented hemostatic gauze
for the healthcare and wound care sectors. Our gauze product, HemoStyp®, is a neutralized, oxidized, regenerated
cellulose (“NORC”) derived from cotton and designed to absorb exudate/drainage from superﬁcial wounds and help control
bleeding. We are in the process of seeking regulatory approval to sell our Hemostyp product line into the U.S. Class III and
European Union CE Mark surgical market.
 
Note 2. Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going
concern. The Company has incurred recurring net losses, negative working capital and operations have not provided cash
ﬂows. Additionally, the Company does not currently have suﬃcient revenue producing operations to cover its operating
expenses and meet its current obligations. In view of these factors, there is substantial doubt about the Company's ability
to continue as a going concern. The Company intends to ﬁnance its future development activities and its working capital
needs largely from the sale of public equity securities with some additional funding from other traditional ﬁnancing
sources, including term notes, until such time that funds provided by operations are suﬃcient to fund working capital and
other business requirements. The ﬁnancial statements of the Company do not include any adjustments relating to the
recoverability and classiﬁcation of recorded assets, or the amounts and classiﬁcations of liabilities that might be
necessary should the Company be unable to continue as a going concern.
 
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the outbreak of a coronavirus (COVID-19) as a
pandemic. As a result, economic uncertainties have arisen which have the potential to negatively impact the Company’s
ability to raise funding. Other factors that carry ﬁnancial implications for the Company could occur although the potential
impacts are unknown at this time.
 
Basis of Presentation
 
The Company prepares its ﬁnancial statements on the accrual basis of accounting in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
Use of Estimates
 
The preparation of ﬁnancial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles requires the
Company’s management to make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at
the date of the ﬁnancial statements and the reported amounts of income and expenses during the reported period.
Changes in the economic environment, ﬁnancial markets, as well as in the healthcare industry, and any other parameters
used in determining these estimates, could cause actual results to diﬀer.
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
The Company considers all highly liquid debt investments purchased with a maturity of three months or less to be
cash equivalents.
 
 
F-7
 
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
Accounting principles generally accepted in the United States deﬁne fair value as the exchange price that would be
received for an asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or most advantageous market for the
asset or liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. Additionally, the inputs
used to measure fair value are prioritized based on a three-level hierarchy. This hierarchy requires entities to maximize
the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. The three levels of inputs used to measure fair
value are as follows:
 
Level 1 — Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
 
Level 2 — Observable inputs other than quoted prices included in Level 1. We value assets and liabilities included in
this level using dealer and broker quotations, bid prices, quoted prices for similar assets and liabilities in active markets,
or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by observable market data.
 
Level 3 — Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no market activity and that are signiﬁcant to the fair
value of the assets or liabilities. This includes certain pricing models, discounted cash ﬂow methodologies and similar
techniques that use signiﬁcant unobservable inputs.
 
Fair value estimates discussed herein are based upon certain market assumptions and pertinent information
available to management as of December 31, 2021 and 2020. The respective carrying value of certain on-balance-sheet
ﬁnancial instruments approximated their fair values due to the short-term nature of these instruments.
 
Income Taxes
 
The Company accounts for income taxes using a method that requires recognition of deferred tax assets and
liabilities for expected future tax consequences of temporary diﬀerences that currently exist between tax bases and
ﬁnancial reporting bases of the Company’s assets and liabilities which is commonly known as the asset and liability
method. In assessing the ability to realize deferred tax assets, the Company considers whether it is more likely than not
that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
 
The Company evaluates its tax positions taken or expected to be taken in the course of preparing the Company’s
tax returns to determine whether the tax positions are ‘‘more-likely-than-not’’ of being sustained by the applicable tax
authority. Tax positions not deemed to meet the “more-likely-than-not” threshold are recorded as an expense in the
applicable year. The Company does not have a liability for any unrecognized tax beneﬁts. Management’s evaluation of
uncertain tax positions may be subject to review and adjustment at a later date based upon factors including, but not
limited to, an on-going analysis of tax laws, regulations and interpretations thereof, with due consideration given to the
fact that tax periods are open to examination by tax authorities.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company has approximately $20.0 and $17.8 million of net operating loss
carry-forwards, respectively, available to aﬀect future taxable income and has established a valuation allowance equal to
the tax beneﬁt of the net operating loss carry forwards and temporary diﬀerences as realization of the asset is not
assured.
 
 
F-8
 
 
Revenue Recognition
 
The Company recognizes revenue in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers. Under ASC
606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the following steps: (1) identify
the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price;
(4) allocate the transaction price to each performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each
performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are recognized
based on the agreed upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised goods are transferred
to the customer. The transfer of goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s performance obligation will
occur either at the time when products are shipped or when the products arrive and are received by the customer
depending on the shipping terms. No discounts are oﬀered by the Company as part of payment terms. The Company does
not provide an estimate for returns as there is no anticipation for any returns in the normal course of business.
 
Trade Accounts Receivable and Concentration Risk
 
We record accounts receivable at the invoiced amount and we do not charge interest. We review the accounts
receivable by amounts due from customers which are past due to identify speciﬁc customers with known disputes or
collectability issues. In determining the amount of the reserve, we make judgments about the creditworthiness of
signiﬁcant customers based on ongoing credit evaluations. We will also maintain a sales allowance to reserve for potential
credits issued to customers. We will determine the amount of the reserve based on historical credits issued.
 
There was no provision for doubtful accounts recorded at December 31, 2021 and 2020. The Company recorded $0
in bad debt expense for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2021 one customer accounted for 100% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2020 one customer accounted for 100% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
Inventory
 
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value using the ﬁrst-in, ﬁrst-out (FIFO) method. Inventory
on the balance sheet consists of raw materials purchased by the Company and ﬁnished goods.
 
   December
31,
2021  December
31,
2020 
Raw materials  $ -  $ 50,654 
Finished goods    -    19,020 
   $ -  $ 69,674 
 
During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company determined that $69,649 and $6,979, needed to
be impaired and written-oﬀ, respectively.
 
 
F-9
 
 
Advertising and Marketing Costs
 
Advertising and marketing costs are expensed as incurred. The Company incurred $166,510 and $206,572 in advertising
and marketing costs during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
 
Shipping and Handling Costs
 
The Company includes shipping and handling cost as part of cost of goods sold.
 
Research and Development
 
The Company charges research and development costs to expense when incurred. The Company incurred $237,458
and $245,218 in research and development expenses during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-Stock
Compensation. Under the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is measured at the fair
value of the consideration received, or the fair value of the equity instruments issued, or liabilities incurred, whichever is
more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all stock-based awards to employees and directors is recognized
as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally the vesting period.
 
The Company accounts for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with Accounting
Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to Nonemployee Share-
Based Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at the value on the grant date.
 
Per Share Information
 
Basic earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding for the
period presented. Diluted earnings per share is computed using the weighted-average number of common shares and, if
dilutive, potential common shares outstanding during the period. The dilutive eﬀect of potential common shares is not
reﬂected in diluted earnings per share because the Company incurred a net loss for the years ended December 31, 2021
and 2020 and the eﬀect of including these potential common shares in the net loss per share calculations would be anti-
dilutive.
 
The total potential common shares as of December 31, 2021 include 28,190,000 of restricted stock units. The total
potential common shares as of December 31, 2020 include 59,330,000 of restricted stock units and 1,867,500 shares of
common stock for convertible notes payable – related party.
 
 
F-10
 
 
Property and Equipment
 
Property and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation is computed on the straight-line method. The depreciation
and amortization methods are designed to amortize the cost of the assets over their estimated useful lives, in years, of
the respective assets as follows:
 
Equipment 10 years
   
Maintenance and repairs are charged to expense as incurred. Improvements of a major nature are capitalized. At
the time of retirement or other disposition of property and equipment, the cost and accumulated depreciation are removed
from the accounts and any gains or losses are reﬂected in income.
 
Impairment of Long-lived Assets
 
The Company applies the provisions of ASC 360, Property, Plant and Equipment, where applicable to all long-lived
assets. ASC 360 addresses accounting and reporting for impairment and disposal of long-lived assets. The Company
periodically evaluates the carrying value of long-lived assets to be held and used in accordance with ASC 360. ASC 360
requires impairment losses to be recorded on long-lived assets used in operations when indicators of impairment are
present and the undiscounted cash ﬂows estimated to be generated by those assets are less than the assets’ carrying
amounts. In that event, a loss is recognized based on the amount by which the carrying amount exceeds the fair market
value of the long-lived assets. Loss on long-lived assets to be disposed of is determined in a similar manner, except that
fair market values are reduced for the cost of disposal.
 
When equipment is sold or retired, the related cost and accumulated depreciation are removed from the accounts and any
gain or loss is included in the results of operations. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 the Company
determined its property and equipment should be impaired and $101,350 and $0 was written oﬀ, respectively.
 
New Accounting Pronouncements
 
In August 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) issued Accounting Standards Update (ASU) No.
ASU 2020-06, Debt—Debt with Conversion and Other Options (Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in
Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting for Convertible Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own
Equity, which simpliﬁes the accounting for certain ﬁnancial instruments with characteristics of liabilities and equity,
including convertible instruments and contracts on an entity’s own equity.
 
Under current GAAP, there are ﬁve accounting models for convertible debt instruments. ASU 2020-06 removes from
U.S. GAAP the separation models for (1) convertible debt with a cash conversion feature and (2) convertible instruments
with a beneﬁcial conversion feature. As a result, after adopting the ASU’s guidance, entities will not separately present in
equity an embedded conversion feature in such debt. Instead, they will account for a convertible debt instrument wholly
as debt, and for convertible preferred stock wholly as preferred stock (i.e., as a single unit of account), unless (1) a
convertible instrument contains features that require bifurcation as a derivative under ASC 815 or (2) a convertible debt
instrument was issued at a substantial premium. Additionally, for convertible debt instruments with substantial premiums
accounted for as paid-in capital, the FASB decided to add disclosures about (1) the fair value amount and the level of fair
value hierarchy of the entire instrument for public business entities and (2) the premium amount recorded as paid-in
capital.
 
ASU 2020-06 will be eﬀective for public business entities that meet the deﬁnition of a Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) ﬁler, excluding entities eligible to be smaller reporting companies as deﬁned by the SEC, for ﬁscal years
beginning after December 15, 2021, including interim periods within those ﬁscal years. For all other entities, the
amendments are eﬀective for ﬁscal years beginning after December 15, 2023, including interim periods within those ﬁscal
years. Early adoption is permitted, but no earlier than ﬁscal years beginning after December 15, 2020, including interim
periods within those ﬁscal years. The Company is currently evaluating the potential impact of the adoption of this
accounting pronouncement to its ﬁnancial statements.
 
The Company considers all new pronouncements and management has determined that there have been no other
recently adopted or issued accounting standards that had or will have a material impact on its ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-11
 
 
Note 3. Related Party Transactions
 
Related party convertible notes payables
 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, convertible notes payable – related parties totaled $0 and $456,032,
respectively.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $251,730 which was convertible at
$0.65. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $83,156 which was recorded to interest expense – related
party upon issuance. The Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling $505,765, $87,750 was assigned to the
Company’s legal counsel and $24,000 was forgiven during the year ended December 31, 2020, leaving a balance of $0
owed to Mr. Beplate as of December 31, 2020. These loans were made to pay for operating expenses of the Company, due
on demand and carried no interest rate.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer loaned the Company $450,000
and also converted $105,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note and loans were convertible at
$0.50 per share at the discretion of the Mr. Thom, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%.
The loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $338,105 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt
discount was amortized through the maturity dates and $138,792 was amortized to interest expense – related party during
the year ended December 31, 2020. As of December 31, 2020, the total outstanding balance of the note and loans was
$555,000 and the remaining unamortized debt discount was $199,314.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Thom converted $45,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible
note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Thom, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and
carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $45,000 which was recorded as a
debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity date and a total of $244,314 for all of Mr. Thom’s
notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021, which included the
unamortized debt discount of $199,314 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $45,000 recorded during the
current year. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
The total outstanding principal balance of $600,000 which was related to $450,000 of loans to the Company and
$150,000 of accrued compensation along with accrued interest of $10,135 was converted into 1,220,272 shares of
common stock leaving $0 owed to Mr. Thom as of December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer loaned the Company $130,000
and also converted $150,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note and loans are convertible at $0.50
per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, have a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and have an interest rate of 3%. During
the year ended December 31, 2020, $110,000 of the convertible note payable along with $1,028 of accrued interest was
assigned to the Company’s legal counsel leaving a total outstanding balance of the note and loans of $170,000. The loans
and note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $174,985 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt
discount was amortized through the maturity dates and $105,331 was amortized to interest expense – related party during
the year ended December 31, 2020.
 
 
F-12
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Schiliro converted $45,000 of accrued compensation into a
convertible note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, had a maturity date of March
31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $45,000 which was
recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity date and a total of $114,654 for all of
Mr. Schiliro’s notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021, which
included the unamortized debt discount of $69,654 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $45,000 recorded
during the current year. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, $175,000 of the convertible note payable along with $1,502 of accrued
interest was assigned to one of the Company’s legal counsel leaving a total outstanding balance of $40,000. The
remaining balance of $40,000 along with accrued interest was converted into 80,173 shares of common stock leaving $0
owed to Mr. Schiliro as of December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Kristofer Heaton, the Principal Financial Oﬃcer, converted $3,750 of
accrued compensation into a convertible loan. The loan was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Heaton,
had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. This note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion
feature totaling $3,750 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity
date and $0 was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2020.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Heaton, converted $22,500 of accrued compensation into a
convertible note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Heaton, had a maturity date of March
31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $22,500 which
was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity date and a total of $26,250 for
all of Mr. Heaton’s notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021,
which included the unamortized debt discount of $3,750 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $22,500
recorded during the current period. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
The total outstanding principal balance of $26,250 along with accrued interest was converted into 52,666 shares of
common stock leaving $0 owed to Mr. Heaton as of December 31, 2021.
 
Interest expense – related party on the above convertible notes was $392,112 ($6,894 interest expense along with
$385,218 of debt discount amortization) and $336,203 ($8,925 interest expense along with $327,278 of debt discount
amortization) during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Accrued interest – related party due to
these convertible notes was $2,308 and $7,503 as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
 
Loans payable/Advances from related parties
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Schiliro advanced the Company $34,000 to pay for operating
expenses and paid $30,000 of expenses on behalf of the Company.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 25,000 shares of common stock to settle $20,000
of the outstanding balance. The shares of common stock had a fair market value of $26,750 and the Company recorded a
loss on debt settlement of $6,750.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, the balance owed to Mr. Schiliro was $44,000 and $0,
respectively. These amounts were converted to a loan payable and have an interest rate of 10% and are due on demand.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Thom loaned the Company a total of $175,000 to pay for operating
expenses. As of December 31, 2021, the amount of $175,000 is owed to Mr. Thom. The loans have an interest rate of 10%
and are due on demand.
 
Interest expense – related party on the above loans payable – related party was $2,308 during the year ended
December 31, 2021 leaving an accrued interest – related party balance of $2,308.
 
 
F-13
 
 
Accrued liabilities
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, $188,375 was paid to Mr. Beplate, $100,000 of accrued compensation
was converted to a convertible note payable and then assigned to the Company’s legal counsel and $8,395 of accrued
compensation was forgiven. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the note holder, had a
maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature
totaling $100,000 which was recognized into interest expense. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, $0 and $0 was owed to
Mr. Beplate, respectively.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $74,056 was owed to Nate Knight, who was the
Company’s Chief Financial Oﬃcer until November 2020, for accrued compensation and reimbursable expenses. During the
year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 78,500 shares of common stock to settle the total balance owed of
$74,056. The shares of common stock had a fair market value of $82,425 and the Company record a loss on debt
settlement of $8,368.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $899 and $0 was owed to Brian Thom, the Chief Executive
Oﬃcer, for accrued compensation and reimbursable expenses. During the years ended December 2021 and 2020, $45,000
and $105,000 of compensation were converted into convertible loans as mentioned above. In the year ended December
31, 2021, $135,000 of accrued compensation was settled with the issuance of 270,000 shares of common stock. The stock
had a fair market value of $221,400 which resulted in a $86,400 loss on settlement of debt (see Note 6).
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $59,467 was owed to Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating
Oﬃcer, for accrued salary and reimbursable expenses, respectively. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020,
$45,000 and $150,000 of compensation were converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above and in the year ended
December 31, 2020 $30,000 was paid in cash.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 74,335 shares of common stock to settle the total
prior year balance owed of $59,467 and issued 270,000 shares of common stock to settle $135,000 of accrued
compensation. The shares of common stock had a total fair market value of $300,938 and the Company recorded a loss on
settlement of debt in the amount of $106,471 (see Note 6).
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $52,625 was owed to Mr. Heaton, for accrued
compensation and services provided. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, $22,500 and $3,750 of
compensation were converted into a convertible note as described above.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, 320,250 shares of common shares of stock were issued to settle
$105,000 of accrued compensation and $52,625 of prior accruals. The shares of common stock had a total fair market
value of $262,605 and the Company recorded a loss on settlement of debt in the amount of $104,980 (see Note 6).
 
Equity transactions
 
On July 21, 2020, the Board of Directors approved amendments to RSU Agreements put in place on March 25, 2019
(“2019 RSU Agreement”). The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate from
33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000, increased
the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the oﬃce
administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO from 250,000 to 500,000 and increased the
amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the former oﬃce administrator from
250,000 to 500,000.
 
 
F-14
 
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an additional
15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20% of RSU units on
January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the Company achieves $20 million
in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger
Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event
described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with 5,070,00
being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton, 75,000 being issued
to the former oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 75,000 being issued to
the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the former oﬃce administrator. The change in vesting terms also
resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued to the Marketing and
Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the former oﬃce administrator. The vesting of the 6,845,000 RSU’s resulted
in stock-based compensation expense of $4,859,950 which was the fair value of the stock on the vesting date.
 
The former oﬃce administrator resigned during the year ended December 31, 2020 and forfeited 425,000 of the
remaining unvested RSU’s with a value of $301,750 ($70,567 of which had been recognized and reversed).
 
In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 RSU’s which subject to certain conditions, shall vest
upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton. The second
agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date and 500,000 of which
would be granted on May 15, 2021 provided his professional services agreement was in eﬀect on that date. The 500,000
RSU’s were granted during 2021 per the agreement. The RSU’s, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the
achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company issued a total of 125,000 shares of restricted common
stock to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for services rendered. The shares had a fair market value of
$100,625.
 
Per the vesting schedules of certain of the Company’s amended RSU Agreements, on January 1, 2021, 6,760,000
shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Beplate, 2,000,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Schiliro and
100,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Heaton.
 
On January 6, 2021, the Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the RSU Agreement between the
Company and Mr. Beplate in conjunction with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management role with the
Company. The amendment accelerated the vesting and immediately settled his remaining RSU’s by issuing 21,970,000
shares of common stock. Further, as a bonus in recognition of Mr. Beplate’s service to the Company and in recruitment of
new executive management, the Company issued to Mr. Beplate an additional 2,000,000 shares of common stock. The
Company recorded $26,127,300 of stock-based compensation expense during the year ended December 31, 2021 related
to the accelerated vesting of these RSU’s and issuance of common stock.
 
 
F-15
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, 200,000 of Mr. Heaton’s RSU’s mentioned above vested due to achievement of
certain Company objectives. The Company recorded stock-based compensation expense $220,000 related to the vesting
of these RSU’s which was the grant date fair value.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 30,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Thom,
30,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Schiliro and 25,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Heaton for services rendered.
The 85,000 shares of common stock had a total fair market value of $69,700.
 
Note 4. Convertible Notes
 
Convertible notes 2020
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, certain service providers and a medical advisor converted $205,000 of
accrued compensation into convertible notes. The notes were convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the note
holders, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. As of December 31, 2020, the
convertible loans had a principal balance of $205,000 and the balance on the loans net of the debt discount was $103,920
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company’s legal counsel was assigned $298,778 worth of loans
after paying various outstanding balances on behalf of the Company. In addition, the Company’s legal counsel converted
$45,000 of accrued fees into a convertible note payable. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of
the note holder, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial
conversion feature totaling $45,000 which was recorded as a debt discount, to be amortized through its maturity date. The
Company’s legal counsel converted all of the convertible loans into 557,056 shares of common stock in accordance with
the original conversion features of the notes, therefore no gain or loss on debt settlement was recognized and the total
debt discount of $45,000 was recognized into interest expense. As of December 31, 2020, no amounts were owing to the
Company’s legal counsel related to these transactions.
 
Interest expense was $1,537 and $0 during the year ended December 31, 2020 and the entire amount was accrued.
 
Convertible notes 2021
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the service providers and medical advisor converted $90,000 of accrued
compensation into convertible notes. The notes were convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the note holders,
had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. These notes resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion
feature of $90,000 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity dates
and a total of $191,080 was amortized to interest expense during the year ended December 31, 2021, which included the
unamortized debt discount of $101,080 as of December 31, 2020 and the $90,000 recorded during the year. The remaining
unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
The total outstanding principal balance of $295,000 ($205,000 principal balance from 2020 and $90,000 principal
balance from 2021) along with accrued interest of $3,569 was converted into 597,139 shares of common stock leaving $0
owed to the service providers and medical advisor as of December 31, 2021.
 
 
F-16
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, one of the Company’s legal counsel was assigned $175,000 worth of
convertible notes payable and $1,502 of accrued interest after paying outstanding balances owed to Mr. Schiliro (see Note
3). The Company’s legal counsel converted the entire balance of $176,502 into 350,000 shares of common.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued a total of $115,000 in convertible notes to two
unaﬃliated individuals to pay for operating expenses. The notes were convertible at $0.85 per share provided that in the
event the Company issues any shares of common stock before the maturity date at a price that is lower than $0.85 per
share, the conversion price shall be reduced to equal such lower issue price per share. The notes had a maturity date of
June 30, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. These notes resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $32,412 which
was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity dates of the notes. A total amount
of $32,412 was amortized to interest expense related to these two notes during the year ended December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the $115,000 principal balance and $397 of accrued interest was
converted into 137,996 shares of common stock leaving a balance of $0 owed on the two convertible notes.
 
Note 5. Property and Equipment
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, the balance of property and equipment consisted of the
following:
 
   December
31,  December
31, 
   2021   2020  
Equipment (not placed in service)  $ -  $101,350 
Accumulated depreciation    -    - 
   $ -  $101,350 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the equipment was fully impaired and $101,350 was written-oﬀ.  The
equipment had not yet been placed in service and therefore depreciation expense for the years ended December 31, 2021
and 2020 was $0 and $0, respectively.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company acquired property and equipment of $0 and
$101,350, respectively.
  
Note 6. Issuances of Securities
 
Share issuances 2020
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company had the following common stock issuances:
 
 · 2,000,500 shares of common stock were sold to non-aﬃliated investors in a private placement for total
cash proceeds of $1,130,696
 · 50,000 shares of common stock were issued to a former medical advisor for services rendered with a fair
value of $47,500
 · 250,000 shares of common stock were issued to a consultant for services rendered with a fair value of
$153,750
 · 125,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for
services rendered with a fair value of $100,625
 · 1,058,634 shares of common stock with a fair value of $866,482 were issued for debt which resulted in a
loss on debt settlement of $316,915
 · 22,381 shares of common stock were cancelled reducing common stock by $22 and increasing additional
paid-in capital by the same amount.
   
 
F-17
 
 
Share issuances 2021
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company had the following common stock issuances:
 
 · A total of 32,490,000 shares of common stock were issued to oﬃcers, directors and various consultants
related to vesting of RSU’s with a total stock-based compensation cost of $24,467,597.
 · 2,000,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Beplate as a stock bonus with a stock-based
compensation cost of $2,180,000.
 · 125,000 shares of common stock were sold to an aﬃliated investor in a private placement for total cash
proceeds of $100,000.
 · 370,455 shares of common stock were sold to non-aﬃliated investors in a private placement for total cash
proceeds of $326,000.
 · 61,000 shares of common stock were sold to Triton Funds LP (“Triton”) for cash proceeds of $53,802 (see
below for discussion of the purchase agreement).
 · 100,000 shares of common stock were issued for settlement of a business consulting agreement with a fair
value of $111,000.
 · 40,000 shares of common stock with a fair value of $32,800 were issued to consultants for services
provided.
 · 85,000 shares of common stock with a fair value of $69,700 were issued to oﬃcers of the Company for
services provided (see Note 3).
 · 25,000 shares of commons stock with a fair value of $26,750 were issued to settle $20,000 of related party
advances which resulted in a loss on settlement of debt of $6,750 (see Note 3).
 · 1,013,085 shares of common stock were issued to settle accrued liabilities – related party worth $561,548
and recorded at market value of $867,368 which resulted in a loss on settlement of debt of $306,220 (see
Note 3).
 · 380,000 shares of common stock with a fair value of $311,600 were issued to settle accrued compensation
worth $190,000 which resulted in $121,600 loss of settlement of debt.
 · 1,085,135 shares of common stock were issued due to the conversion of convertible notes payable and
accrued interest of $590,467 (see Note 4)
 · 1,353,111 shares of common stock were issued due to the conversion of convertible notes payable and
accrued interest – related party of $676,555 (see Note 3)
  · 300,000 shares of common stock were issued for litigation settlement with a fair value of $312,000
 · 117,647 shares of common stock were cancelled reducing common stock by $117 and increasing additional
paid-in capital by the same amount.
   
 
F-18
 
  
Triton Purchase Agreement
 
On June 25, 2021, the Company entered into a common stock purchase agreement (the “Purchase Agreement”)
with Triton to sell Triton up to $6,000,000 of common stock. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Purchase
Agreement, Triton agreed to purchase from the Company $4,000,000 in value of common shares at closing, based on a
purchase price determined by dividing $200,000,000 by the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock, as reported
by the Company on its most recently ﬁled Form 10-K or 10-Q. Among customary closing conditions in the Purchase
Agreement, closings under the Purchase Agreement may occur after a registration statement covering the resale of the
shares which Triton has agreed to purchase from the Company is ﬁled by the Company and declared eﬀective by the SEC,
if and when the Company issues a purchase notice to Triton for the number of shares in the purchase notice. Under the
terms of the Purchase Agreement, Triton has the right to reduce the amount requested in the purchase notice or not close
if the marketplace of the Company’s shares is below a certain threshold at the time of closing.
 
In addition, the Purchase Agreement grants Triton the option to purchase up to $2,000,000 worth of additional
shares of common stock at the same purchase price at any time prior to the second anniversary of the closing of the
transaction.
 
On June 29, 2021, we ﬁled a registration statement on Form S-3 covering the above shares. The Company’s S-3
registration statement was declared eﬀective by the SEC on September 29, 2021.
 
The market value of the Company’s shares has remained below the level under which Triton is not obligated to
complete a purchase of shares. Until such time as the market price for the Company’s shares rises above the threshold
price deﬁned in the Purchase Agreement, the Company will not have access to this funding.
 
Restricted stock units
 
As discussed in Note 3, during the year ended December 31, 2020 the Board of Directors approved amendments to
the 2019 RSU Agreement.
 
The amendment resulted in 9,960,000 of the RSU’s vesting on January 1, 2021. The fair value of the 9,960,000
RSU’s was $7,071,600. The compensation expense was being amortized on a straight-line basis from the date of the
amendment through January 1, 2021 which is the vesting date. Stock-based compensation of $43,121 was recognized as
expense during the year ended December 31, 2021.
 
On January 6, 2021, the Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
between the Company and Mr. Beplate, former Chief Executive Oﬃcer and current Chairman of the Board, in conjunction
with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management role with the Company. The amendment accelerated the
vesting and immediately settled his remaining RSU’s by issuing 21,970,000 shares of common stock. Per ASC 718-20-35,
the change in vesting conditions resulted in a modiﬁcation of the stock-based compensation awards. The modiﬁcation is
considered a Type III modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and resulted in recording $23,947,300 of stock-based
compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
 
As discussed in Note 3, during the year ended December 31, 2020, Mr. Thom was granted 11,500,000 RSU’s and Mr.
Heaton was granted 500,000 RSU’s. The vesting conditions are contingent upon the achievement of certain Company
objectives and milestones which the management is unable to determine when they will be achieved.
 
 
F-19
 
 
In April 2021, the Company entered into an RSU agreement with a service provider granting 750,000 RSU’s on the
date of the agreement and will grant an additional 750,000 RSU’s, upon the receipt by the Company of an FDA Class III
PMA. The 750,000 RSU’s had a grant date fair value of $664,875. The RSUs, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon
the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones which management is unable to determine when they will
be achieved therefore no compensation expense was recognized during the year ended December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company terminated the services of one of its legal counsels who
had an RSU agreement in place. Per the RSU agreement, all of the unvested RSU’s owed to the legal counsel vested
immediately upon termination of services. This resulted in 325,000 shares of common stock being issued and $230,750 of
stock-based compensation being recorded which was the fair value of the shares on the original grant date of the RSU
agreement.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company recorded the grant of 100,000 RSU’s to one of its legal
counsels and 35,000 of the RSU’s vested.  The vested RSU’s had a grant date fair value of $26,425 which was recorded as
stock-based compensation expense.
 
                As discussed in Note 3, Mr. Heaton was granted 500,000 RSU’s in December of 2020 and an additional 500,000
RSU’s in May of 2021. The vesting conditions are contingent upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and
milestones. During the year ended December 31, 2021, certain objectives were achieved which resulted in the vesting of
200,000 of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton. The 200,000 RSU’s had a grant date fair value of $220,000 which was recorded as
stock-based compensation expense.
 
Management is unable to determine if and when FDA approval of a PMA Class III will be awarded to the Company or
when a change of control will occur, if at all, and as of December 31, 2021, there was a total of $27,017,200 unrecognized
compensation cost related to the restricted stock unit awards.
 
Activity related to our restricted stock units during the year ended December 31, 2020 was as follows:
 
   
Number of
Units  Weighted
Average
Grant
Date Fair
Value 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2019   50,350,000  $ 0.94 
Units granted   62,350,000  $ 0.80 
Units Exercised/Released   (7,595,000) $ 0.71 
Units Cancelled/Forfeited   (45,775,000) $ 0.94 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2020   59,330,000  $ 0.82 
 
Activity related to our restricted stock units during the year ended December 31, 2021 was as follows:
 
   
Number of
Units  Weighted
Average
Grant
Date Fair
Value 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2020   59,330,000  $ 0.82 
Units granted   23,320,000  $ 1.08 
Units Exercised/Released   (32,490,000) $ 0.97 
Units Cancelled/Forfeited   (21,970,000) $ 0.71 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2021   28,190,000  $ 0.96 
 
 
F-20
 
 
Note 7. Litigation
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven Safran as
Plaintiﬀ against the Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This case was transferred to the United States
District Court in Las Vegas, Nevada. Mr. Safran sought damages and monies allegedly owed pursuant to an employment
agreement of approximately $734,000 and allegedly unpaid loans of $245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company
denied the Plaintiﬀ’s allegations. On July 21, 2021, Mr. Safran and the Defendants entered into a Settlement Agreement
and General Release whereby the Company agreed to pay $250,000 in cash and issue 300,000 shares of common stock to
Mr. Safran. The 300,000 shares have a fair market value of $312,000. As of December 31, 2021, the 300,000 shares of
common stock have been issued and $250,000 in cash has been paid.
 
In March 2021, the Company received payment of $304,273 from Maxim Group LLC, representing the full settlement
payment in accordance with a Settlement Agreement in a previously disclosed arbitration between the Company and
Maxim that was reached in December 2019.
 
Philip Forman, who served as Chairman, a director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor of the
Company at various times between 2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our then-Chief
Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States District Court of the District of Nevada. The plaintiﬀ has claimed,
among other things: that the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment Agreement with the
Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not enforceable due to lack of
consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the plaintiﬀ sold Company shares issued
to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite the fact that all payment for the shares under the
Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s 2014 Employment Agreement remains valid and that he is
entitled to cash and stock compensation under that Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment);
that if the Amendment is enforceable, he is entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that
those shares were sold to a third party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and
Mr. Beplate defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the
parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase Agreement; money
damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company ﬁled a motion to dismiss the
plaintiﬀ’s claims which was denied on March 19, 2020. On May 5, 2021, the plaintiﬀ provided a deposition as instructed by
the Court, subsequent to which the Company ﬁled a motion for dismissal of this proceeding. On February 14, 2022, the
Court issued an Order which declared the Amendment to be unenforceable and thus the terms of the original Employment
Agreement to remain in eﬀect. The Order also noted that the Company is not a party to the Stock Purchase Agreement,
and the Employment Agreement does not constitute a prior agreement that could have been superseded by the Stock
Purchase Agreement. The parties are currently engaged in settlement discussions.
 
In 2018 an action was commenced in the United States District Court Southern District of New York entitled JEC
Consulting Associates, LLC. Liquidator of Lead Dog Capital LP against United Health Products t/k/a United EcoEnergy Corp
and Douglas K. Beplate under Docket Number 18-cv-1139 (ER). The third party action sought to remove a restrictive
legend from a particular stock certiﬁcate for Three Million Fifty Thousand (3,050,000) shares and declare the shares to be
free trading. The third party plaintiﬀ alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate refused to have the restrictive legend on
the stock certiﬁcate removed under Rule 144 and sought compensatory and punitive damages. The Federal court issued an
order that the Securities Exchange Commission should review the claim before the District Court renders a ﬁnal
ruling. Discovery appears to be substantially complete and settlement discussions between the third party plaintiﬀ and the
Company have been initiated.
 
 
F-21
 
 
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of the above legal proceedings.
 
The Company has commenced the following legal proceedings:
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the Texas District
Court for the 215th Judicial District of Harris County against defendants Patterson Companies Inc., Patterson Management,
L.P., Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc., and Animal Health International, Inc. On March 5,
2020, the defendants removed the case to U.S. District Court for Southern District of Texas. The defendants ﬁled their
answer in federal court on March 12, 2020. The original August 25, 2020 pretrial deadlines were extended.  On January 18,
2022, the Company’s claims were dismissed, with prejudice, by the court. On February 9, 2022, the Company and
Patterson reached an agreement on settlement of Patterson’s counterclaim.  The Company agreed to pay $120,000 which
has been accrued as of December 31, 2021.
 
The defendants ﬁled a Motion for Summary Judgment which was denied by the court on March 11, 2021.
 
In August 2020, United Health Products ﬁled suit against its former auditors, Haynie & Company, in Utah State
Court, asserting claims related to professional negligence and breach of ﬁduciary duty. Haynie & Company has denied the
allegations. Discovery is largely complete and the parties have each submitted a report by their respective expert witness
to the Court.
 
Note 8. Income Tax
 
The Company accounts for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) Accounting
Standards Codiﬁcation (“ASC”) No. 740, Income Taxes (“ASC 740”). Under ASC 740, deferred tax assets and liabilities are
recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to diﬀerences between the ﬁnancial statement carrying amounts
of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using
enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary diﬀerences are expected to
be recovered or settled. Under ASC 740, the eﬀect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is
recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment date. 
 
The Company did not take any uncertain tax positions and had no adjustments to its income tax liabilities or
beneﬁts pursuant to the provisions of Section 740-10-25 for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020. The Company
recognizes interest accrued related to unrecognized tax beneﬁts in interest expense and penalties in operating expenses.
No such interest or penalties were recognized during the period presented. The Company had no accruals for interest and
penalties at December 31, 2021 or 2020.
 
The Company’s federal income tax returns for the years ended December 31, 2018 through December 31, 2021
remain subject to examination by the Internal Revenue Service as of December 31, 2021.
 
During 2021 and 2020, the Company incurred net losses and, therefore, has no tax liability. The net deferred tax
asset generated by the loss carry-forward has been fully reserved.
 
 
F-22
 
  
Net deferred tax assets consist of the following components as of December 31, 2021 and 2020
 
   2021  2020 
Deferred tax assets:         
Net operating loss carryover  $4,203,500  $3,735,500 
Accrued related party payroll   (14,000)   (6,200)
Valuation allowance   (4,189,500)  (3,729,300)
Net deferred tax asset  $ -  $ - 
The income tax provision diﬀers from the amount of income tax determined by applying the U.S federal income tax
rate (21%) for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 due to the following:
            
   2021  2020 
Book income  $(6,415,300) $(3,299,400)
Related party accrued payroll   (14,000)   (6,200)
(Gain) Loss on debt settlement    91,300    66,500 
Stock for services and compensation   5,706,400   2,671,800 
Interest amortization   127,800   112,500 
Inventory write-oﬀ    14,600    1,500 
Property and equipment write-oﬀ    21,300    - 
Valuation allowance   467,900   453,300 
Income tax expense  $ -  $ - 
 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Company has taxable net loss carryovers of approximately $20.0 and $17.8
million, respectively, that may be oﬀset against future taxable income.
 
Note 9. Other Income
 
As described in Note 7 above, during the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company received payment of
$304,273 from Maxim Group LLC, as full and ﬁnal settlement of its previously disclosed arbitration between the Company
and Maxim that was settled in December 2019. The $304,273 was recorded as other income in the Statement of
Operations.
 
Note 10. Subsequent Events
 
The Company has evaluated events from December 31, 2021, through the date whereupon the ﬁnancial statements
were issued and has determined that there are no material events that need to be disclosed, except as follows:
 
The issued a total of 162,662 shares of common stock for the following:
 
  · 6,252 shares of common stock were issued to a consultant for the reimbursement of expenses.
  · 136,410 shares of common stock were sold to unaﬃliated investors for total proceeds of $57,292
  · 20,000 shares of common stock were issued to legal counsel for services provided
   
The Company received a total of $165,000 in advances from its CEO and $20,000 from a former oﬃcer.
 
The Company entered into a $100,000 promissory note.  The note accrues interest at 1% and requires monthly
payments of $9,136 until the balance is paid in full.
 
 
F-23
 
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
 
None
 
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
 
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
 
The Company needs to implement disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)
of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the ‘‘Exchange Act’’), that are designed to ensure that information required to be
disclosed in the Company’s Exchange Act reports are recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time
periods speciﬁed in the rules and forms of the Securities and Exchange Commission, and that such information is
accumulated and communicated to our Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer to allow timely decisions
regarding required disclosure.
 
As of December 31, 2021, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer carried out an assessment, of the
eﬀectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to Exchange Act Rules 13a-
15(b) and 15d-15(b). As of the date of this assessment, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer concluded
that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures were not eﬀective as of December 31, 2021.
 
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting, as such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act. The Company’s
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Internal control over ﬁnancial reporting includes
those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly
reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions
are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the
interim or annual ﬁnancial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Principal Financial Oﬃcer assessed the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2021. In performing its assessment of the eﬀectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, management applied the criteria described in the Internal Control-
Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (‘‘COSO -
2013’’).
 
A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or a combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting,
such that there is a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the Company’s annual or interim ﬁnancial
statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.
  
 
24
 
  
The material weaknesses identiﬁed during management’s assessment were the following:
 
 •Inadequate corporate governance
     
 •Inadequate internal control structure and control environment
     
 •Lack of information technology controls
     
 •Lack of segregation of duties
     
 •Limited accounting resources with SEC experience, US generally accepted accounting principles knowledge and
tax accounting expertise
 
These material weaknesses could result in a material misstatement of signiﬁcant accounts or disclosures that
would result in a material misstatement to the Company’s interim or annual ﬁnancial statements that would not be
prevented or detected.
 
Because of the material weaknesses, management concluded that the Company did not maintain eﬀective internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the criteria in Internal Control-Integrated Framework
issued by COSO -2013.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There were no reported changes in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting for the year ended December 31, 2021.
 
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
 
None.
 
 
25
 
 
PART III
 ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
 
Directors and Executive Oﬃcers
 
Our directors and executive oﬃcers as of the ﬁling date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K are as follows:
 
Name   Age  Position with Company 
Directors and
Executive Oﬃcers
          
Brian Thom   56  Chief Executive Oﬃcer,  and Director  
          
Kristofer Heaton   43  Vice President of Finance and Principal Financial Oﬃcer  
         
Robert Denser   50  Director  
 
Our directors hold oﬃce for one-year terms and until their successors have been elected and qualiﬁed. Our oﬃcers
are appointed annually and serve at the discretion of the Board.
 
Brian Thom was appointed as Chief Executive Oﬃcer eﬀective December 1, 2020 and joined our Board as a
Director on January 1, 2021.  Mr. Thom has served as a consultant to the Company since April 2020 overseeing ﬁnance and
business development activities and has served as external ﬁnancial advisor to the Company since 2018. He brings over
20 years of corporate ﬁnance experience and a successful track record of helping fast growing companies across a broad
range of industries to raise capital and create shareholder value. Over the course of his career he spent a decade with
JPMorgan’s global Mergers and Acquisitions group and ﬁve years leading the Americas Corporate Finance group with
Société Générale, a multi-national European investment bank, among other entrepreneurial pursuits.
 
 
26
 
 
Kristofer Heaton was brought on as the Vice President of Finance and Principal Financial Oﬃcer in December
2020. Mr. Heaton is a CPA designation and began his career in commercial banking with a bank in Salt Lake City in 2004. In
2006, he moved to public accounting and gained experience in various industries while working for various ﬁrms. Mr.
Heaton founded his own accounting ﬁrm in 2015 which specializes in audits of public companies and has provided non-
audit accounting and administrative services to the Company since 2017.
 
Robert J. Denser has served as a Director of the Company since November 2014. Over the past 10 years his main
focus has been to assist federal and state agencies, ﬁrst responders, EMS agencies and hospitals with their planning and
procurement of the necessary medical equipment needed to be adequately prepared for any type of natural or man-made
disaster. This includes working with the Medical Directors and their teams from the State of California and Los Angeles
County with the development and fulﬁllment of a $60 million project that will give hospitals the caches of medical
equipment needed to properly respond to the surge of patients that will result from a disaster. For the past ﬁve years Mr.
Denser has been a member of ETL Response, LLC and has been in the role of Director of Sales and Finance. In this role he
coordinates all ETL projects as needed. ETL Response. Mr. Denser’s background experience also includes direct access to
key decision makers within the VA hospital system, as well as federal and private disaster response agencies, like FEMA
and the Red Cross, that are on the front lines of any disaster.
 
Directors’ and Oﬃcers’ Liability Insurance
 
We are currently seeking to obtain directors’ and oﬃcers’ liability insurance against any liability for acts or
omissions in their capacities as directors or oﬃcers, subject to certain exclusions. Such insurance also would insure us
against losses which we may incur in indemnifying our oﬃcers and directors. In addition, we may enter into
indemniﬁcation agreements with key oﬃcers and directors and such persons shall also have indemniﬁcation rights under
applicable laws, and our certiﬁcate of incorporation and bylaws.
 
Corporate Governance
 
Our business, property and aﬀairs are managed by, or under the direction of, our Board, in accordance with the
General Corporation Law of the State of Nevada and our By-Laws. Members of the Board are kept informed of our business
through discussions with the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and other key members of management, by reviewing materials
provided to them by management.
 
We continue to review our corporate governance policies and practices by comparing our policies and practices with
those suggested by various groups or authorities active in evaluating or setting best practices for corporate governance of
public companies. Based on this review, we have adopted, and will continue to adopt, changes that the Board believes are
the appropriate corporate governance policies and practices for our Company. We have adopted changes and will continue
to adopt changes, as appropriate, to comply with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and subsequent rule changes made by
the SEC and any applicable securities exchange.
 
Director Qualiﬁcations and Diversity
 
The Board seeks independent directors who represent a diversity of backgrounds and experiences that will enhance
the quality of the board’s deliberations and decisions. Candidates shall have substantial experience with one or more
publicly traded companies or shall have achieved a high level of distinction in their chosen ﬁelds. The Board is particularly
interested in maintaining a mix that includes individuals who are active or retired executive oﬃcers and senior
executives, particularly those with experience in the medical device and health care industries.
 
In evaluating Director candidates, our Board also looks for certain personal attributes, such as integrity, ability and
willingness to apply sound and independent business judgment, comprehensive understanding of a director’s role in
corporate governance, availability for meetings and consultation on Company matters, and the willingness to assume and
carry out ﬁduciary responsibilities. Qualiﬁed candidates for membership on the Board will be considered without regard to
race, color, religion, sex, ancestry, national origin or disability.
 
 
27
 
 
Risk Oversight
 
Enterprise risks are identiﬁed and prioritized by management and each prioritized risk is assigned to the full board
for oversight. These risks include, without limitation, the following:
 
 •Risks and exposures associated with strategic, ﬁnancial and execution risks and other current matters that may
present material risk to our operations, plans, prospects or reputation.
     
 •Risks and exposures associated with ﬁnancial matters, particularly ﬁnancial reporting, tax, accounting,
disclosure, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, ﬁnancial policies, investment guidelines and credit and
liquidity matters.
     
 •Risks and exposures relating to corporate governance; and management and director succession planning.
     
 •Risks and exposures associated with leadership assessment, and compensation programs and arrangements,
including incentive plans.
 
Board Leadership Structure
 
In accordance with the Company’s By-Laws, the Chairman of the Board presides at all meetings of the Board. The
position of Chairman of the Board of the Company was held by Douglas Beplate until his resignation as a director eﬀective
on February 28, 2022. Mr. Thom holds the position of Chief Executive Oﬃcer and currently is serving as Chairman [Pro
Tem]. The Company has no ﬁxed policy with respect to the separation of the oﬃces of the Chairman of the Board and
Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
  
Code of Ethics 
 
We have adopted a Code of Ethics within the meaning of Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K of the Exchange Act. This
Code of Ethics applies to our directors and senior oﬃcers, such as the principal executive oﬃcer, principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer
and persons performing similar functions. Our Code of Ethics is available as Exhibit 14 to our Annual Report on Form 10-K
ﬁled April 16, 2010.
 
Committees
 
As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the Board of Directors has no committees. Robert. Denser may be deemed an
independent directors of the Company as that term is deﬁned under the Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Mr. Denser is
not deemed to be a ﬁnancial expert. The term “Financial Expert” is deﬁned under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as
amended, as a person who has the following attributes: an understanding of generally accepted accounting principles and
ﬁnancial statements; has the ability to assess the general application of such principles in connection with the accounting
for estimates, accruals and reserves; experience preparing, auditing, analyzing or evaluating ﬁnancial statements that
present a breadth and level of complexity of accounting issues that are generally comparable to the breadth and
complexity of issues that can reasonably be expected to be raised by the company’s ﬁnancial statements, or experience
actively supervising one or more persons engaged in such activities; an understanding of internal controls and procedures
for ﬁnancial reporting; and an understanding of audit committee functions.
 
 
28
 
 
Communications with the Board of Directors
 
Stockholders may communicate with the Board of Directors by sending a letter to United Health Products, Inc.
Board of Directors, c/o our securities counsel, Ruskin Moscou Faltischek, PC, East Tower 15th Floor, 1425 RXR Plaza,
Uniondale, New York 11556. Our securities counsel will receive the correspondence and forward it to the Chairman or to
any individual director or directors to whom the communication is directed, unless the communication is unduly hostile,
threatening or illegal, does not reasonably relate to the Company or its business, or is similarly inappropriate. The
Chairman of the Board has the authority to discard or disregard any inappropriate communications or to take other
appropriate actions with respect to any such inappropriate communications.
 
Medical Advisory Board
 
As the Company continues to pursue its FDA application to have HemoStyp approved for Class III surgical uses in
the United States and abroad, it has formed a Medical Advisory Board which consists of the following persons as of the
date of this ﬁling:
 
Gerard Abate, MD Former Executive Director, Medical Aﬀairs for Fortune 500 company Quest Diagnostics, where he
directed 80+ Medical Aﬀairs group that includes 8 clinical franchise medical directors, (oncology, genetics, women’s
health, cardiovascular-metabolism, neurology, infectious disease/inﬂammation), HEOR team, publications group, MSLs,
genetic counselors and project management.
 
Michael Erik Jessen MDProfessor and Chairman, and Frank M. Ryburn, Jr. Distinguished Chair in Cardiothoracic Surgery
and Transplantation, Department of Cardiovascular and Thoracic Surgery, University of Texas Southwestern Medical
Center.
 
Richard Massoth, DDS, MSD received his specialty training in Endodontics and his Master of Science in Dentistry from
Boston University in 1982. He has been an Adjunct Professor at the UCLA School of Dentistry and has been in clinical
practice for 36 years. Dr. Massoth has been a published author and a symposium speaker on “Endodontic Microsurgery”
and “The Use of Cone Beam CT Scans in Endodontic Diagnosis.”
 
David Ramey, DVM brings thirty-ﬁve years of clinical experience as a full-time veterinarian, specializing in the care of
performance and pleasure horses. He has written and published thirteen books, ﬁve book chapters, and over seventy
papers in professional journals. Dr. Ramey is a frequent speaker on various veterinary topics at universities, conventions,
and continuing education seminars around the United States, as well as Canada, Australia, and the UK.
 
 
29
 
 
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth the overall compensation earned over the ﬁscal years ended December 31, 2021 and
2020 by (1) each person who served as the principal executive oﬃcer of the Company during ﬁscal year 2021; (2) our most
highly compensated (up to a maximum of two) executive oﬃcers as of December 31, 2021 with compensation during
ﬁscal year ended 2021 of $100,000 or more; and (3) those individuals, if any, who would have otherwise been included in
section (2) above but for the fact that they were not serving as an executive as of December 31, 2021.
 
   Fiscal
Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($)  Stock
Awards ($)
(1) (4)  Options
Awards
($)(1)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)  Non-qualiﬁed
Deferred
Compensation
Earnings ($)  All Other
Compensation
($)(2)(3)  
Total ($) 
                                     
Douglas
Beplate 2021 $ -0-  $-0-  $26,156,566  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $26,156,566 
Former
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer 
(5) 2020 
$220,000  
$-0-  
$3,599,700  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$3,819,700 
                                             
Brian
Thom  2021 $180,000  $-0-  $ 24,600  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $204,600 
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer 2020 
$105,000  
$-0-  
$100,625  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$205,625 
                                             
Kristofer
Heaton   2021 $127,500  $-0-  $240,933  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $368,433 
Principal
Financial
Oﬃcer  2020 
$3,750  
$-0-  
$ 53,250  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ 57,000 
                                             
Louis
Schiliro 2021 $180,000  $-0-  $ 33,259  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $213,259 
Former
Chief
Operating
Oﬃcer
(6) 2020 
$180,000  
$-0-  
$1,065,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$1,245,000 
 _____________
(1)FASB ASC Topic 718 requires the company to determine the overall full grant date fair value of the restricted stock
awards and options as of the date of grant based upon the Black-Scholes method of valuation which total amounts
are set forth in the table above under the year of grant, and to then expense that value over the service period over
which the restricted stock awards and options become vested. As a general rule, for time-in-service-based restricted
stock awards and options, the company will immediately expense any restricted stock awards and option or portion
thereof which is vested upon grant, while expensing the balance on a pro rata basis over the remaining vesting term
of the restricted stock awards and options. For a description FASB ASC Topic 718 and the assumptions used in
determining the value of the restricted stock awards and options under the Black-Scholes model of valuation, see the
notes to the ﬁnancial statements included with this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Includes all other compensation not reported in the preceding columns, including (i) perquisites and other personal
beneﬁts, or property, unless the aggregate amount of such compensation is less than $10,000; (ii) any “gross-ups” or
other amounts reimbursed during the ﬁscal year for the payment of taxes; (iii) discounts from market price with
respect to securities purchased from the company except to the extent available generally to all security holders or
to all salaried employees; (iv) any amounts paid or accrued in connection with any termination (including without
limitation through retirement, resignation, severance or constructive termination, including change of
responsibilities) or change in control; (v) contributions to vested and unvested deﬁned contribution plans; (vi) any
insurance premiums paid by, or on behalf of, the company relating to life insurance for the beneﬁt of the named
executive oﬃcer; and (vii) any dividends or other earnings paid on stock or option awards that are not factored into
the grant date fair value required to be reported in a preceding column.
   
(3)Includes compensation for service as a director described under Director Compensation, below.
   
(4)The Company issued RSU’s which vest according to certain performance conditions as discussed in the ﬁnancial
statements. The grant date fair value of the RSU’s granted assuming all performance conditions are met would be;
$13,570,000 for Brian Thom; $4,615,000 for Lou Schiliro and $1,110,750 for Kristofer Heaton.
   
(5)Resigned as Chief Executive Oﬃcer eﬀective on December 1, 2020. Resigned as director eﬀective on February 28,
2022.
   
(6)Resigned as Chief Operating Oﬃcer and a director eﬀective on February 28, 2022. Mr. Schiliro continues in a non-
oﬃcer position with the Company with a focus on the Company’s FDA PMA application, new product and format
development, R&D and manufacturing.
 
 
30
 
 
For a description of the material terms of each named executive oﬃcers’ compensation arrangements, including
the terms of any contract, agreement, plan or other arrangement that provides for any payment to a named executive
oﬃcer in connection with his or her resignation, retirement or other termination, or a change in control of the company see
section below entitled “Compensation Arrangements.”
 
No outstanding common share purchase option or other equity-based award granted to or held by any named
executive oﬃcer were repriced or otherwise materially modiﬁed, including extension of exercise periods, the change of
vesting or forfeiture conditions, the change or elimination of applicable performance criteria, or the change of the bases
upon which returns are determined, nor was there any waiver or modiﬁcation of any speciﬁed performance target, goal or
condition to payout, other than as described below.
 
Stock Awards – Restricted Stock Units
 
On July 21, 2020, the Board of Directors approved amendments to RSU Agreements put in place on March 25, 2019
(“2019 RSU Agreement”). The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Company’s former CEO
Mr. Beplate from 33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Company’s former COO Mr.
Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000,
increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former
CEO from 250,000 to 500,000 and increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the
son of the former oﬃce administrator from 250,000 to 500,000.
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an additional
15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20% of RSU units on
January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the Company achieves $20 million
in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger
Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event
described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with 5,070,00
being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton, 75,000 being issued
to the former oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 75,000 being issued to
the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the former oﬃce administrator. The change in vesting terms also
resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued to the Marketing and
Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the former oﬃce administrator. The vesting of the 6,845,000 RSU’s resulted
in stock-based compensation expense of $4,859,950 which was the fair value of the stock on the vesting date.
  
The former oﬃce administrator resigned during the year ended December 31, 2020 and forfeited 425,000 of the
remaining unvested RSU’s with a value of $301,750 ($70,567 of which had been recognized and reversed).
   
In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 RSU’s which subject to certain conditions, shall vest
upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton. The second
agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date and 500,000 of which
would be granted on May 15, 2021 provided his professional services agreement was in eﬀect on that date. The 500,000
RSU’s were granted during 2021 per the agreement. The RSU’s, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the
achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company issued a total of 125,000 shares of restricted common
stock to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer on December 1, 2020, for services rendered. The shares had a
fair market value of $100,625.
 
Per the vesting schedules of certain of the Company’s amended RSU Agreements, on January 1, 2021, 6,760,000
shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Beplate, 2,000,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Schiliro and
100,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Heaton.
 
Compensation Agreements
 
Messrs. Thom and Heaton are being compensated at the monthly rate of $15,000 and $12,500 respectively,
pursuant to services agreements entered with each of them. Mr. Schiliro was being compensated at the monthly rate of
$15,000 pursuant to services agreement in his capacity as Chief Operating Oﬃcer until his resignation from that position
eﬀective on February 28, 2022. Mr. Schiliro remains in a non-oﬃcer position with the Company at the same rate of
compensation.
 
 
31
 
  
OUTSTANDING EQUITY AWARDS AT FISCAL YEAR END
 
The following table sets forth all outstanding equity awards held by our named executive oﬃcers as of December 31,
2021.
 
    Option Awards    Stock Awards  
Name Number of
Securities
Underlying
Unexercised
Options (#)
Exercisable  Number of
Securities
Underlying
Unexercised
Options (#)
Unexercisable  
Option
Exercise
Price
($)  
Option
Expiration
Date  Number of
Shares or
Units That
Have Not
Vested
(#)  Market
Value of
Shares
or Units
of Stock
That
Have Not
Vested(1)
($) 
Brian Thom,    —    —  $ —    —   11,500,000  $ 1.18 
CEO                               
                                
Lou Schiliro,    —    —  $ —    —   6,500,000  $ 0.71 
Former COO (2)                               
                                
Kristofer Heaton,    —    —  $ —    —           
Principal Financial Oﬃcer                       325,000  $ 0.71 
                        400,000  $ 1.00 
                        400,000  $ 1.20 
_____________
(1)Market value is based on the stock price on the day the Restricted Stock Unit agreement or amendment was entered
into.
   
(2)Resigned as Chief Operating Oﬃcer and a director eﬀective on February 28, 2022. Mr. Schiliro continues in a non-
oﬃcer position with the Company with a focus on the Company’s FDA PMA application, new product and format
development, R&D and manufacturing.
 
DIRECTOR COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth certain information concerning the compensation paid to our directors not named as
an executive oﬃcer in this Item 11 above for services rendered to us during the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2021.
 
Name Fees
Earned or
Paid in
Cash
($)  
Stock
Awards  
Option
Awards  
Total 
Robert Denser  $ —  $ —  $ —  $ — 
 
Cash Fees and Options
 
Currently the Company has no audit, compensation, corporate governance, nominating or other committee of the
Board of Directors, although it intends to establish an audit, compensation and corporate governance committee in the
future as part of the process to achieve a full exchange listing. No cash fees have been paid to board members for serving
on the board.
 
 
32
 
 
Travel Expenses
 
All directors are entitled to be reimbursed for their reasonable out of pocket expenses associated with attending
director and shareholder meetings in person.
 
Review of Risks Arising from Compensation Policies and Practices
 
We have reviewed our compensation policies and practices for all employees and concluded that any risks arising
from our policies and practices are not reasonably likely to have a material adverse eﬀect on the Company.
 
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
 
As of March 22, 2022, the Company had 228,829,891 shares of Common Stock outstanding. The only persons of
record who presently hold or are known to own (or believed by the Company to own) beneﬁcially more than 5% of the
outstanding shares of such class of stock are listed below. The following table also sets forth certain information as to
holdings of the Company’s Common Stock of all oﬃcers and directors individually, and all oﬃcers and directors as a
group.
 
Name and Address of Beneﬁcial Owner (1) Number of
Common
Shares  
Percentage 
Oﬃcers and Directors         
Brian Thom   845,296   * 
Robert Denser   1,550,000   * 
Kristofer Heaton   997,916   * 
All directors and oﬃcers as a group (three persons)   3,393,212    1.5%
            
5% Beneﬁcial Owners:           
Douglas K. Beplate (2)   32,547,190    14.2%
___________
* Represents less than 1%
(1)
 
 Beneﬁcial ownership is determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, and is generally determined by voting powers and/or investment powers with respect to securities. Unless
otherwise noted, all of such shares of common stock listed above are owned of record by each individual named as
beneﬁcial owner and such individual has sole voting and dispositive power with respect to the shares of common
stock owned by each of them. Such person or entity’s percentage of ownership is determined by assuming that any
options or convertible securities held by such person or entity, which are exercisable within sixty (60) days from the
date hereof, have been exercised or converted as the case may be, but not for the purposes of determining the
number of outstanding shares held by any other named beneﬁcial owner. All addresses are c/o United Health
Products, Inc., 10624 S. Eastern Ave., Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052.
(2)Excludes 137,307 shares owned by his spouse.
 
Stock Bonuses
 
None during the ﬁscal years ending December 31, 2021 and 2020.
 
 
33
 
 
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans.
 
On August 8, 2013, the Board of Directors approved the 2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services
Compensation Plan (the “2013 Plan”) which had 15,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. The 2013 Plan
provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock and the granting of non-statutory stock options on terms
established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof. While the Plan provides for incentive stock options, no
incentive stock options may be granted under the Plan since no stockholder approval was obtained on or before August 8,
2014. In September 2013, the Company issued 6,000,000 shares of stock under the 2013 Plan to the Company’s former
CEO Douglas Beplate pursuant to his consulting agreement then in eﬀect. No other shares or options have been granted
under the 2013 Plan. There are currently 9,000,000 of shares available for issuance under this 2013 Plan.
 
On October 30, 2019, the Board of Directors approved the 2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services
Compensation Plan (the “2019 Plan”) which has 2,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. The 2019 Plan
provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock and the granting of non-statutory stock options or incentive
stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof. The Plan has not been approved by the
Company’s stockholders. The Company approved the issuance of 1,525,000 shares in November 2019 to certain persons
who were then consultants, oﬃcers and directors. The Company has not issued any options under this 2019 Plan.
 
Separate from the 2013 Plan and 2019 Plan, the Board of Directors has approved individual Restricted Stock Unit
Agreements with certain consultants, oﬃcers and directors (including now former oﬃcers and directors) which represent
an unvested aggregate amount of 59,330,000 and 28,190,000 as of December 31, 2020 and 2021, respectively, which upon
vesting will result in the issuance of common shares. These include RSUs issued to oﬃcers and directors (including now
former oﬃcers and directors) as follows:
 
In March 2019, Mr. Beplate was granted 33,000,000 RSUs, Mr. Schiliro was granted 8,000,000 RSUs and Mr. Heaton
was granted 50,000 RSUs. In July 2020, Mr. Beplate was granted an additional 800,000 RSUs, Mr. Schiliro was granted an
additional 2,000,000 RSUs, Mr. Heaton was granted an additional 950,000 RSUs. In December 2020, Mr. Thom was granted
11,500,000 RSUs.
 
In July 2020, 15% of the RSU’s vested with 5,070,00 being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr.
Schiliro and 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton.
 
On January 1, 2021, 20% of the RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate which totaled 6,760,000 vested, 20% of the RSU’s
granted to Mr. Schiliro which totaled 2,000,000 vested and 20% of the RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton which totaled 100,000
vested.
 
In January 2021, the Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
between the Company and Douglas Beplate in conjunction with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management
role with the Company. The amendment accelerated the vesting and immediately settled his remaining Restricted Stock
Units (“RSUs”) in a total of 28,730,000 restricted shares. Further, as a bonus in recognition of Mr. Beplate’s service to the
Company and in recruitment of new executive management, the Company agreed to issue to Mr. Beplate an additional
2,000,000 million restricted shares of common stock.
 
In September 2021, 200,000 of the RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton vested due to certain objectives being achieved.
 
 
34
 
 
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
 
Related party convertible notes payables
 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, convertible notes payable – related parties totaled $0 and $456,032,
respectively.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $251,730 which was convertible into
shares of Company common stock at $0.65/share. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $83,156 which
was recorded to interest expense – related party upon issuance. The Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling
$505,765, $87,750 was assigned to one of the Company’s legal counsel and $24,000 was forgiven during the year ended
December 31, 2020, leaving a balance of $0 owed to Mr. Beplate as of December 31, 2020. These loans were made to pay
for operating expenses of the Company, due on demand and carried no interest rate.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer loaned the Company $450,000
and also converted $105,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note and loans were convertible at
$0.50 per share at the discretion of the Mr. Thom, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%.
The loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $338,105 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt
discount was amortized through the maturity dates and $138,792 was amortized to interest expense – related party during
the year ended December 31, 2020. As of December 31, 2020, the total outstanding balance of the note and loans was
$555,000 and the remaining unamortized debt discount was $199,314.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Thom converted $45,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible
note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Thom, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and
carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $45,000 which was recorded as a
debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity date and a total of $244,314 for all of Mr. Thom’s
notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021, which included the
unamortized debt discount of $199,314 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $45,000 recorded during the
current year. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
The total outstanding principal balance of $600,000 which was related to $450,000 of loans to the Company and
$150,000 of accrued compensation along with accrued interest of $10,135 was converted into 1,220,272 shares of
common stock leaving $0 owed to Mr. Thom as of December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Louis Schiliro, the Company’s former Chief Operating Oﬃcer and
director, loaned the Company $130,000 and also converted $150,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The
note and loans are convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, have a maturity date of March 31, 2021
and have an interest rate of 3%. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $110,000 of the convertible note payable
along with $1,028 of accrued interest was assigned to one of the Company’s legal counsel leaving a total outstanding
balance of the note and loans of $170,000. The loans and note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $174,985
which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity dates and $105,331 was
amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2020.
 
 
35
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Schiliro converted $45,000 of accrued compensation into a
convertible note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, had a maturity date of March
31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $45,000 which was
recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount was amortized through the maturity date and a total of $114,654 for all of
Mr. Schiliro’s notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021, which
included the unamortized debt discount of $69,654 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $45,000 recorded
during the current year. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, $175,000 of the convertible note payable along with $1,502 of accrued
interest was assigned to one of the Company’s legal counsel leaving a total outstanding balance of $40,000. The
remaining balance of $40,000 along with accrued interest was converted into 80,173 shares of common stock leaving $0
owed to Mr. Schiliro as of December 31, 2021.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Kristofer Heaton, the Principal Financial Oﬃcer, converted $3,750 of
accrued compensation into a convertible loan. The loan was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Heaton,
had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. This note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion
feature totaling $3,750 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity
date and $0 was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2020.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Heaton, converted $22,500 of accrued compensation into a
convertible note. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Heaton, had a maturity date of March
31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $22,500 which
was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity date and a total of $26,250 for
all of Mr. Heaton’s notes was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2021,
which included the unamortized debt discount of $3,750 as of December 31, 2020 and the debt discount of $22,500
recorded during the current period. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $0.
 
The total outstanding principal balance of $26,250 along with accrued interest was converted into 52,666 shares of
common stock leaving $0 owed to Mr. Heaton as of December 31, 2021.
 
Interest expense – related party on the above convertible notes was $392,112 ($6,894 interest expense along with
$385,218 of debt discount amortization) and $336,203 ($8,925 interest expense along with $327,278 of debt discount
amortization) during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Accrued interest – related party due to
these convertible notes was $2,308 and $7,503 as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
 
 
36
 
 
Loans payable/Advances from related parties
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Schiliro advanced the Company $34,000 to pay for operating
expenses and paid $30,000 of expenses on behalf of the Company.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 25,000 shares of common stock to settle $20,000
of the outstanding balance. The shares of common stock had a fair market value of $26,750 and the Company recorded a
loss on debt settlement of $6,750.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, the balance owed to Mr. Schiliro was $44,000 and $0,
respectively. These amounts were converted to a loan payable and have an interest rate of 10% and are due on December
31, 2022 and prepayable without penalty at the Company’s option with 10 days’ notice.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Mr. Thom loaned the Company a total of $175,000 to pay for operating
expenses. As of December 31, 2021, the amount of $175,000 is owed to Mr. Thom. The loans have an interest rate of 10%
and are due on December 31, 2022 and prepayable without penalty at the Company’s option with 10 days’ notice.
 
Interest expense – related party on the above loans payable – related party was $2,308 during the year ended
December 31, 2021 leaving an accrued interest – related party balance of $2,308.
 
Accrued liabilities
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, $188,375 was paid to Mr. Beplate, $100,000 of accrued compensation
was converted to a convertible note payable and then assigned to the Company’s legal counsel and $8,395 of accrued
compensation was forgiven. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the note holder, had a
maturity date of March 31, 2021 and carried an interest rate of 3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature
totaling $100,000 which was recognized into interest expense. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, $0 and $0 was owed to
Mr. Beplate, respectively.
  
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $74,056 was owed to Nate Knight, who was the
Company’s Chief Financial Oﬃcer until November 2020, for accrued compensation and reimbursable expenses. During the
year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 78,500 shares of common stock to settle the total balance owed of
$74,056. The shares of common stock had a fair market value of $82,425 and the Company record a loss on debt
settlement of $8,368.
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $899 and $0 was owed to Brian Thom, the Chief Executive
Oﬃcer, for accrued compensation and reimbursable expenses. During the years ended December 2021 and 2020, $45,000
and $105,000 of compensation were converted into convertible loans as mentioned above. In the year ended December
31, 2021, $135,000 of accrued compensation was settled with the issuance of 270,000 shares of common stock. The stock
had a fair market value of $221,400 which resulted in a $86,400 loss on settlement of debt (see Note 6).
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $59,467 was owed to Louis Schiliro, the former Chief
Operating Oﬃcer, for accrued salary and reimbursable expenses, respectively. During the years ended December 31, 2021
and 2020, $45,000 and $150,000 of compensation were converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above and in the
year ended December 31, 2020 $30,000 was paid in cash.
 
 
37
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 74,335 shares of common stock to settle the total
prior year balance owed of $59,467 and issued 270,000 shares of common stock to settle $135,000 of accrued
compensation. The shares of common stock had a total fair market value of $300,938 and the Company recorded a loss on
settlement of debt in the amount of $106,471 (see Note 6).
 
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $0 and $52,625 was owed to Mr. Heaton, for accrued
compensation and services provided. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, $22,500 and $3,750 of
compensation were converted into a convertible note as described above.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, 320,250 shares of common shares of stock were issued to settle
$105,000 of accrued compensation and $52,625 of prior accruals. The shares of common stock had a total fair market
value of $262,605 and the Company recorded a loss on settlement of debt in the amount of $104,980 (see Note 6).
  
Equity transactions
 
On July 21, 2020, the Board of Directors approved amendments to RSU Agreements put in place on March 25, 2019
(“2019 RSU Agreement”). The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate from
33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000, increased
the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the oﬃce
administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and Chairman from 250,000 to 500,000 and
increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the former oﬃce
administrator from 250,000 to 500,000.
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an additional
15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20% of RSU units on
January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the Company achieves $20 million
in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger
Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event
described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with 5,070,00
being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton, 75,000 being issued
to the former oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 75,000 being issued to
the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the former oﬃce administrator. The change in vesting terms also
resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued to the Marketing and
Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the former oﬃce administrator. The vesting of the 6,845,000 RSU’s resulted
in stock-based compensation expense of $4,859,950 which was the fair value of the stock on the vesting date.
  
The former oﬃce administrator resigned during the year ended December 31, 2020 and forfeited 425,000 of the
remaining unvested RSU’s with a value of $301,750 ($70,567 of which had been recognized and reversed).
   
 
38
 
 
In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 RSU’s which, subject to certain conditions, shall vest
upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton. The second
agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date and 500,000 of which
were granted on May 15, 2021. The RSU’s, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain
Company objectives and milestones.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company issued a total of 125,000 shares of restricted common
stock to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for services rendered. The shares had a fair market value of
$100,625.
 
Per the vesting schedules of certain of the Company’s amended RSU Agreements, on January 1, 2021, 6,760,000
shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Beplate, 2,000,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Schiliro and
100,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Heaton.
 
On January 6, 2021, the Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the RSU Agreement between the
Company and Mr. Beplate in conjunction with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management role with the
Company. The amendment accelerated the vesting and immediately settled his remaining RSU’s by issuing 21,970,000
shares of common stock. Further, as a bonus in recognition of Mr. Beplate’s service to the Company and in recruitment of
new executive management, the Company issued to Mr. Beplate an additional 2,000,000 shares of common stock. The
Company recorded $26,127,300 of stock-based compensation expense during the year ended December 31, 2021 related
to the accelerated vesting of these RSU’s and issuance of common stock.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, 200,000 of Mr. Heaton’s RSU’s mentioned above vested due to
achievement of certain Company objectives. The Company recorded stock-based compensation expense $220,000 related
to the vesting of these RSU’s which was the grant date fair value.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company issued 30,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Thom,
30,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Schiliro and 25,000 shares of common stock to Mr. Heaton for services rendered.
The 85,000 shares of common stock had a total fair market value of $69,700.
 
Director Independence
 
Robert Denser is deemed by management to be an independent director of the Company as that term is deﬁned
under Section 10 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
 
39
 
 
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
 
The following table sets forth the aggregate fees for professional audit services rendered by MAC Accounting Group,
LLP (“MAC”) for the audit of the Company’s annual ﬁnancial statements for the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2021 and
2020, and fees billed for other services provided by MAC in the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
 
   2021  2020 
          
Audit fees  $ 49,500  $ 50,000 
Audit-related fees  $ -  $ - 
Tax fees  $ -  $ - 
All other fees  $ 8,250  $ - 
_________
 
Audit Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of our annual
ﬁnancial statements and the reviews of the ﬁnancial statements included in our Forms 10-Q and for any other services
that were normally provided in connection with our statutory and regulatory ﬁlings or engagements.
 
Audit Related Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for assurance and related
services that were reasonably related to the performance of the audit or review of our ﬁnancial statements and were not
otherwise included in Audit Fees.
 
Tax Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for tax compliance, tax advice and
tax planning. Included in such Tax Fees are fees for preparation of our tax returns and consultancy and advice on other tax
planning matters.
 
All Other Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for products and services provided and not otherwise included in
Audit Fees, Audit Related Fees or Tax Fees. Included in such Other Fees are fees for services rendered in connection with
any private and public oﬀerings or registration statements conducted during such periods.
 
Audit Committee Pre-Approval Policy
 
The Company does not have an audit committee. Audit committee functions are conducted by the Board of
Directors. We understand the need for the accounting ﬁrm to maintain objectivity and independence in its audit of our
ﬁnancial statements. To minimize relationships that could appear to impair their objectivity, our Board has restricted the
non-audit services that they may provide to us.
 
 
40
 
 
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
(1)Financial Statements
   
 The ﬁnancial statements of United Health Products, Inc., supplemental information and report of independent
registered public accounting ﬁrm are included in this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Financial Statement Schedules
 
Schedules have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they are required or because the required
information is included in the ﬁnancial statements or notes thereto.
 
(3)Exhibits
   
  (a)Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are ﬁled with this report, or incorporated by reference as noted:
 
3.1  Articles of Incorporation of the Company dated February 28, 1997. (1)
     
3.2  Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (1)
     
3.3  By-laws of the Company. (2)
     
3.4  August 2015 Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (3)
     
10.1  Services Agreement with Louis Schiliro (5)
    
10.2  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement – Louis Schiliro (7)
    
10.3  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement – Douglas Beplate (7)
    
10.4  Services Agreement with Brian Thom (8)
    
10.5  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Brian Thom (8)
    
10.6  Services Agreement with Kristofer Heaton (9)
     
10.7  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Kristofer Heaton (9)
     
21  Subsidiaries of the Registrant – none
     
31.1  Certiﬁcation of Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
     
31.2  Certiﬁcation of Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
     
32.1  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
     
32.2  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
     
99.1  2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (10)
 
 
41
 
 
101.SCH Document, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
    
101.CAL Calculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition (*)
    
101.DEF Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)
    
101.LAB Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
    
101.PRE Presentation Linkbase (*)
___________
 
* Filed herewith. 
   
 (1)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.
   
(2)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
   
(3)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated August 7, 2015 – date of earliest event ﬁled on August 10, 2015.
   
(4)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated November 23, 2014.
   
(5)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
   
(6)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 16, 2015.
   
(7)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
   
(8)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated December 2, 2020
   
(9)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 11, 2021
   
(10)Incorporated by reference to Form S-8 dated October 31, 2019
 
 
42
 
  
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has caused
this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.  
      
Dated: April 1, 2022 By:/s/ Brian Thom  
   Brian Thom  
   Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Principal
Executive Oﬃcer and Director 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
 
Signatures  Title   Date
        
By:/s/ Brian Thom  Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Principal  April 1, 2022
 Brian Thom  Executive Oﬃcer and Director   
        
By:/s/ Kristofer Heaton  Principal Financial Oﬃcer  April 1, 2022
 Kristofer Heaton      
        
By:/s/ Robert Denser  Director  April 1, 2022
 Robert Denser      
 
 
43
  
